Out of shot are some old ladies happily chatting away to us.
Hindi Movie Title : Andolan: Ek Violence Story
Years ago there was an episode of St. Elsewhere where Dr. Mark Craig's (William Daniels) mentor Dr. David Domidian (Dean Jagger) was returning to the hospital. Mark was thrilled, then shattered to learn that his hero had advanced Alzheimer's. Towards the end of the episode, Dr. Domidian has a single moment of clarity where he looks at Mark, recognizes him and says his name.
The Almighty God that I serve will answer all your prayers from now on. So shall it be in Jesus mighty name of Jesus I pray.
The word had already been used by the philosopher Søren Kierkegaard, and Nietzsche took the sense in which Kierkegaard had used it and developed it further. It is central to understanding his Genealogy of Morals to understand what he means by ressentiment. It is a specific type of resentment which we feel when we are powerless or inferior. We project our resentment onto those who are more powerful than us or superior to us, so that we blame them for our failings. In a sense we create a scapegoat, upon whom we lay all the blame for our own failings or weaknesses. Nietzsche describes it in Genealogy of Morals with an analogy to nature:
God, Thank You for my wonderful family. I love my boys so much and my husband is such an amazing man after Your heart. He is so supportive of me, and encouraging in all I do. Thank You for Your many blessing that I do not deserve. Speak to me and teach me in Your Word. Amen.
1. My husband is actually able to morph back into the person he was before ‘Timan’, even before we were married. This week we did things we used to do prior to the arrival our bundle of endless energy, just the two of us.
My kid gets up from the table. I don't spank him. I just can't do it. That said, I don't know how to keep him in his chair, or in time out, or in his room even when I'm getting frustrated enough to fantasize about how good it must have felt to be my mom wielding the red ping pong paddle over my bare ass. (I doubt she enjoyed it. It probably felt shitty to resort to it after a dramatic out of control fight over my sudden assertion of irrational stubbornness. Or at least I like to believe she was miserable after spanking me because then I feel like my misery is less miserable than hers.)
Too bad this was taken a couple hours ago, and a little late for the Wordless Wednesday: Alternative Caregivers on the Natural Parents Network. Oh well, I love this picture all the same - so of course I asked her permission to share it here with all of you!
So what I got was a piece of paper stating what equipment would be installed, labor included, but still had no idea of the final price or what equipment would ultimately be needed. There's a vast difference between quoted offers and and paying for an operational solar system. Once you've signed that piece of paper and put down your deposit, that's it - you're committed. I would go with them if only they'd been more precise with details, and sent an accredited professional to tell me exactly how my system was going to fit on the roof. He didn't even get up on the roof.
As if never from the clouds
Now as being a CNA and have grown up self educating about the healthcare system and about all the diseases and specific lingo they all use to sound smarter then the average joe has certainly taught me a lot.
Link. Fable of Zelda was my added video game. Hotlink is all-around cool. He has rad weapons, and mad skills. I in actuality adore that he has no dialogue. And let's not overlook his outfit. It is berserk speculated that he's cutting a tunic. I don't accept this. That's a dress. You don't abrasion tights and a belt with a tunic, and anyone with hair as alarming as Link's would apperceive that.
And, as we drive away under the Spanish sun, I say a silent prayer for Amy.
he is painted on fabric with lovely embroidery stitches
For the next few months, I will be nannying and doing various ministries. In April, I will once again be living on a big island in the middle of the ocean :) I am getting so excited for staffing. I already love these students, which sounds creepy but I have been praying tons for them, and the Father has given me His heart for them. I am excited to see them transform, just like I did. I am excited to be challenged and see how I myself will change.
I have a list of 100 things a person needs to do in the role of being/becoming a good sales manager. I truly believe it’s the hardest job in corporate America due to the fact that not only do sales managers have to deal with all varieties of salespeople on a daily basis, which is enough to drive one totally crazy, they also have to deal with top management and ensure the revenue goals are always being met – or they will be quickly replaced. It’s a stressful position.
I’m hooked. I must admit. I saw it again on the weekend when I was out for a short ride. I was just pedalling myself to some new places when I realized I had one of those goofy grins on my face.
BLITZER: I want both of you to weigh in, Governor Romney first?
BACK HOME
Brainy and his Monster Maker art anon
Band of Brides demands men shirts with exceedingly low necklines! Tighter male trousers! More groupies!
President Monroe declared in 1823, ten years before the British started colonizing the Falklands: “The American continents, by the free and independent condition which they have assumed and maintain, are henceforth not to be considered as subjects for future colonization by any European powers.”
affinities: hippy-dippy mystical leanings, but more
This is the first book I’ve read by Michael Bedard, whose Redwork won the Governor General’s Award for children’s literature in 1990. The Green Man is a loose sequel to A Darker Magic, but I don’t think you lose anything in the telling by not having read it first.
Dennis Etchison – The Blood Kiss
And then I was reminded of another mystery writer, Sir Arthur Conan Doyle, and his famous detective, Sherlock Holmes. Once, on a train ride through the countryside, Watson remarked on the beauty and freshness of it all, and Holmes replied, “You look at these scattered houses, and you are impressed by their beauty. I look at them, and the only thought which comes to me is a feeling of their isolation and of the impunity with which crime may be committed here”.
Later today (in about 15 minutes, actually!) I'm off to take my bro-ski out to lunch. We're going to this cute little italian pizza shoppe that's pretty close to the High School. I'm thinking instead of pizza I'll get pasta. Don't want to go too heavy on the grease because...
Bangs, Lester (1988) Psychotic reactions and carburetor dung New York: Vintage Books.
I was pondering on the ephemeral nature of human endeavor the other day—yes, I really do spend my time that way, whenever I’m not surfing the web for free porn or spray-painting DI wuz hea on freeway overpasses—and it occurred to me that I’m laboring in the most ephemeral of all the genres. Thrillers—and other sorts of crime novels to various extents—have the advantage of being able to address issues of the moment. The reverse side of that coin, though, is that thrillers probably have the shortest shelf life of any sort of novel—with the possible exception of science fiction that predicts the near future.
When foreign leaders refused to allow these corporate interests into their country, those leaders were replaced through a variety of covert actions. The form of government that would be installed did not matter to the empire makers so long as the corporate interests were served. In most cases these nations simply surrendered to the seemingly unlimited power of the almighty dollar, thus camouflaging the traditional method of forceful empire building.
I am a huge margarita drinker, and although I'm usually a purist when it comes to the south-of the border staple (classic on the rocks with salt), I can't resist the pretty rosy hue and tart sweetness of this pink grapefruit margarita. I can't think of any better way to spend happy hour on a warm day.
My Mom says that now I'm a 'big dog'.
Cartoons can be a lot of fun. I loved watching Scooby Doo when I was a kid, as well as the Flintstones! On Saturday morning, my brother and I would watch the Bugs Bunny and Roadrunner Show. Those were the days! They do not make cartoons like that anymore. I watched in horror one day when on an episode of Spongebob they discussed farting. Yes, I realize that passing gas is a natural bodily function, but I would prefer hearing it called something other that a fart. That is just a pet peeve of mine. That was the beginning of my dislike of Spongebob.
I got some other junk, but it was just little odds and ends and they're all put away (and I can't find some of them...) and I'm lazy. But these were my best finds, so whatever.
With six pieces of sweet creamy dairy free chocolate with crisped rice pieces per bar.
celebrated its 70 year of service.
I ran my hands up and down the length of her back, each hand just to the side of her spine. I chose about ten spots about an inch apart to apply a slight, forceful impact, and grinned at the characteristic pop as her bones realigned. Each click brought out of her a gasp of excitement and to my joy, a smile.
They had adaptive equipment and peer aides helping some of the kids, and there were kids of all abilities.
I think I have to play with the recipe a little and try to tweak it a smidge for a fuller coke taste in the cake, but all in all it was delicious. Now I have 2 dozen mini whoopie pies and some of my neighbors will be getting a treat tomorrow.
But they left the cellphones intact, he said and added that he was alerted to the IDF presence by the guard in the nearby Tekoa settlement.
In the Land of Hatchy Milatchy
Painful? Yes.
Link in the comments.
When we were kids if we said we were bored our mom gave us a chore. So I am currently working on a "I'm Bored" jar and if they say I'm Bored they have to pick a chore...which will NOT be a fun chore...such as
I chose this as the title because I want to metamorphose, and I hope to change constantly, within my music. The irony is that I want to change towards being closer to who I really am. I think maybe perhaps most people live their lives, constantly adding layers upon layers of thick indecision and uncertainty and hiding themselves. This isn't a bad thing at all, especially if one really believes in it. I'm always trying to dig deeper and metamorphose into something that I was and that I had forgotten.
A P.E. teacher was transferred to another school due to the nature of a controversial event that occurred in the classroom. This teacher denied the Holocaust (as in the genocide, ethnic cleansing, mass slaughter-whatever you want to call it- did not, in fact, occur.) That it was instead a façade, a front, a deliberate Jewish conspiracy to promote the interest of Jews at the expense of other people. That it was virtually impossible for the government to move that many people into concentration camps and for that many people to be gassed. This teacher also went on to say that finding information that supports the Holocaust being a hoax is also impossible, you see, the government covered up their tracks well and have erased all traces of the Holocaust ever having not happened. Right. Moreover, if you attempt to research this theory, the government will come find you, put you in an underground bunker 100ft below D.C. where you will be interrogated and likely tortured by the C.I.A.
Thanks to another inspirational teacher for capturing the imaginations of our children with dragons. I know all of us can’t wait to see their work.
“Part of me wants to explain what is about to happen to you.” She cooed in her afterglow. “But I’ve always felt that finding things out for yourself makes them all the more meaningful. Don’t you agree?”
I think it might have been Henry James who said “Tell a dream, lose a reader.” That’s a lie – I don’t think, I know; I checked it in Google and then changed George Eliot to Henry James in my draft. (And while we’re on the subject of confessions, when I found that I’d got it wrong I said to myself “Ah, of course – Henry James” even though I don’t know who either he or George Eliot is. I think one of then might have been, or still is, a woman, but that’s about as good as my knowledge gets.)
I’m using Industrial here to cover not just Industrial properties but a broad range of related facilities such as warehouses, utilities, telecommunication and business park developments. The guidelines cover single-user industrial, multiple-user industrial and business park developments.
Turkey, where 99% of its population is Muslim, represents another worrying trend. Using the result of this study, we can probably safe to conclude that the Muslim population, in general, reject the theory of evolution strongly. In fact, looking at the graph, one could also say that the ratio of rejection is quite high in comparison to US and the rest of surveyed countries.
Add a bit more olive oil into the frying pan and add onions and stir them around with the wooden spoon until a bit soft.
Today I am thankful for the innocence of childhood. Yesterday we saw a play based on a children's picture book. My 10-year old, fifth grade daughter smiled from ear to ear the whole time. She was excited when the beach balls came out and bounced around in the audience and she eagerly participated in the activities that included the audience. She thoroughly enjoyed it and shared in the excitement of her younger sister.
Don't get me wrong, it was an enjoyable chick-lit book. I think my expectations were really high going into it because Roberts has written so many other romance novels and thus must be an expert at it. It just didn't do it for me.
For example, the pig first looked like a Gynoïd of Hajime Sorayama (this picture is an homage to him). I shared the first version and people on my blog and Facebook gave me their opinions. I finaly changed my mind for a more organic version. It's good to have critics during your process. Thanks technology ...
We planted a bean seed in four different glass jars. One was a control which has all four elements, but in each of the other three jars we left out one of the four elements. We created a chart and have been recording our observations each day of school.
Cruising homeward.
That's it!! Easy as pie. Go make it for your family and hopefully make them smile!
Newcastle: Tim Krul; James Perch, Mike Williamson, Fabricio Coloccini, Davide Santon; Cheick Tiote, Jonas Gutierrez; Hatem Ben Arfa, Yohan Cabaye, Demba Ba; Papiss Cisse
I think the most astonishing thing about Batman: Holy Terror is how Brennert explores exactly what makes Batman. In regular continuity, it’s general knowledge that Bruce Wayne is a hollow identity to cover for the true man underneath, Batman—vice versa, Clark Kent is the real guy, while Superman is a convenient cover. But in a world where Bruce has faith to rely on instead of terror and vengeance, Bruce becomes a whole, functioning person. It’s only when he discovers that the state is corrupt that he breaks. As MGK points out, Brennert makes the case that our Batman isn’t a vigilante because of his parents’ tragic deaths; he’s a vigilante because it’s the only way to fight the broken system that caused their tragic deaths. Which is why Batman ultimately becomes a terrorist in Batman: Holy Terror; the system he’s fighting here is too ubiquitous and powerful for him to be anything but. Instead of making this a fun romp with a alternate take on a character, Brennert takes the opportunity to look at the very core of what makes Batman tick.
A voice is a powerful thing. It can inflect love and compassion or it can evoke fear and frustration. It can even be flat and monotone barely conveying any emotion at all. A parent's voice can calm a crying baby or it can scold a wayward child. It can be uplifting with praise, or show the bitterness of disappointment.
For many years the Chachapoyans (derived from “Chacha” – man, and “Poyas” – clouds) reigned supreme. A fierce, proud culture, it is said they resisted the Inca power that was spreading throughout the Andes on three separate occasions before they were finally forced into submission – possibly through a seige.
They are already asking for more.
I happen to have a painfully difficult individual in my life. Every time this person comes and verbally attacks me, I usually respond with the same level of intensity. (Not a good Idea)
We gave her several reminders throughout the day that we were still waiting to hear something from her. We still waited.
Some activists lament how few anti-authoritarians there appear to be in the United States. One reason could be that many natural anti-authoritarians are now psychopathologized and medicated before they achieve political consciousness of society’s most oppressive authorities.
computer up and running
“from 11 to 18 years of age had been ‘encouraged’ to sign the anti-equality pledge by the school’s headmistress.”
in the middle of a stall–
On the night of the exodus from Egypt, (The Passover) each family sacrificed and ate or shared a lamb, after smearing its blood on the doorpost of the house, so that the angel of death would “pass over” that house and not kill that family’s first born son when He killed the first born sons of the families of Egypt. (The last of the ten plagues)
Personally, I agree with the latter group. After the Arrancar arc, I was given the sense of closure I needed. It was an arc that lasted practically a decade, what with lengthy filler arcs in between. None of the filler arcs I watched really entertained me the way that the main story did, and I haven’t really paid attention to the anime since the end of Arrancar. The only thing I’m a bit bitter about is Ichigo not hooking up with either Rukia or Orihime in all this time! LAME LAME LAME. Pick a girl, Strawberry Head!
It doesn't seem quite appropriate to wish everyone a happy Memorial Day, because it's about people dying. So, um, enjoy the sweet corn and the barbecue, will you?
or hold as memory....
It's huge and thick and will be really cozy next Christmas. I have the backing so this one is ready to be basted by my team of basting elves this week. (What am I going to do when the kids move out?!?)
The area appeared to have calmed down by about 10 a.m. and NATO said all the attackers had been killed. The gate at the entrance of the Green Village was destroyed, with the wreckage of the suicide bomber’s car sitting in front. The road running past the compound was littered with shoes, books, school supplies and the bloody ID card of a student from a nearby school.
The thing is people have been writing ‘different’ and ‘quirky’ books for decades but mostly no one hears about them, which is a shame because some of them are quite good. I imagine when James Joyce published Finnegans Wake there were quite a few people who said to their mates, “Wait till you read this,” in perhaps not an entirely complimentary tone but, love it or loathe it, one thing you can’t say about Finnegans Wake is that it followed in the footsteps of others. As more writers blaze trails it gets harder and harder to read anything that you couldn’t say is in some way derivative. This brings me to Stuart Estell’s novelette Verruca Music which is available now in both print and ebook format from eight cut gallery press. This is how they describe the book:
Luckily the cold weather cools my hot head, and I’m off to the Windpeak Inn to see if there are any leads on work, or at the least, a bed. As I’m about to go in, I can’t help but notice that Abelone, presumably an employee of the Windpeak Inn, seems to be trying her damnedest to walk around a pile of firewood. I try to tell her to just move to the right a little but her only reply is that I should visit the Windpeak Inn. Welp, can’t fix stupid. I walk in.
People who beat themselves up are just the same as people who beat others up!
And who always will.
This is where I wish I could magically produce pictures of the kitchen in our last house. You just can't even begin to understand how much I appreciate this new space after cooking so many meals in a kitchen the size of some people's closets. Our last kitchen was a galley kitchen, and had very little cabinet and drawer space. I bought a shelving system to use as microwave cart/storage area, and that helped some, but the cabinets were overflowing and I had to store stuff above the cabinets as well. I even had some serving pieces and things I used less often (fondue pot, punch bowl, etc) in containers out in the garage.
Yeah, I’m a bit of a day dreamer. Can you tell that I’m at a stage in my life where I wish I had a little privacy? It’s not that I don’t love my family and thank God for them. There are just times where I’d like to be able to read my Bible without one of the kids rushing in to tell me about the latest antics of Spongebob, or listen to hubby cuss the computer because Adobe wants to install another update (usually followed up by the question of “What do I do next?”).
The balloon started to rise tentatively into the air, while the pilot looked for a breeze blowing in the direction of Dead River. He shivered at the thought and put on his fuzzcoat. The pilot radioed his position to the assistant. He glanced at the map and checked his direction.
The lilacs have since turned brown and are dying due to a strange shift in the weather. The stranger thing is that the weather is finally getting back to normal for the end of April aside from the large amount of tornadoes in the area. Let’s hope I won’t get a chance to photograph one of those this summer!
It's hard even now, to go back and try to put into words what the emotional and physical experience felt like, but it was overwhelming, and I tried as best I could to power through, continue to rest, take it easy and try to relax, but the odds seemed to be stacked out of my favor, and the direction of my health did not seem to be in my hands most of the time. I would go for a walk and be blindsided by pain, I would be reading a book, and contractions would start, I would be doing very little and things would just come to a crashing halt. I had to cancel plans and limit my activities. I wouldn't attend this party, or I would sit on the sidelines at that event. I didn't go trick or treating for the first year ever. My whole family went to Radio City Music Hall to see the Christmas Spectacular and I didn't think it was a good idea to be that far away from my doctor.
sara gruen is a wonderful writer and the story kept me entertained from start to finish. i also saw the movie and really enjoyed it. it doesn't hurt that it stars rob pattinson- but i thought it was a good interpretation of the book. a major character was morphed into another character, which took away from some of the story, but in the end was probably the best thing for the movie. i'd recommend both. charming story
Toonman
1971- The Crunch Bird
After 20 minutes of careful scrutiny of my fallen arches & gimpy gait, Ryan touched Princess. Let me note that Princess is very sore and does NOT like to be touched. I had cautioned both the podiatrist and the orthopedist during both their assessments that Princess needs to be handled very lightly & gently.
Mr Campbell claimed his own family of miners had done more for Britain than the Queen.
Reference Notes for "This Honourable and Noble Cause" by Mister Fox
In Chapter 3 of BLUE HOTEL, after fucking schoolteacher Gill Sherry, hooker Alona Tal visits boozy screenwriter Holly Land's room, and invites her to have a drink at the sleazy hotel bar. Meanwhile, Alona's squeeze, drug dealing Begger Leck, travels to the Long Beach docks to pick up his 'latest shipment' ...
I am usually of the opinion not to let free agents-to-be just walk, leaving yourself empty handed. If you know a player is going to leave via free agency, try to find some compensation through a trade before you lose that player outright. Obviously, that general approach doesn’t apply to all circumstances, particularly if an upcoming free agent is crucial to this season’s playoff run (i.e. Papelbon a year ago). But I don’t think Youkilis is an exception to my rule of thumb. If Middlebrooks can play to a satisfactory level, Youkilis is expendable, best utilized in a trade acquiring pitching to shore up a more urgent team need.
Long before the days of “The New Kids on the Block“, “Nsync“, and “The Backstreet Boys“, there was “The Bay City Rollers“…..
In September Grace at Christmas was published and we had a party to celebrate twenty years of Grace in December.
"Then, he scaffolded me." - Stephanie during a class presentation. YES, that's educational terminology... and yes, it was still hilarious.
I frowned. I’d already seen almost every girl from my high school graduating class living out the life Betty had just described. The lucky ones skipped town and went to college. I hadn’t been quite that lucky for a variety of reasons. I could have. I had the grades and the desire, but life had other ideas. On the positive side, which is where I like to go, I at least had not had the misfortune of marrying some guy who didn’t appreciate me, expected his dinner on the table when he got home from his shift at the local textile factory, and wanted his wife and children to obey, just because he said so.
I’ve gone on-and-on enough, already so just a little gem this week courtesy of @elana, @rozanna_banana and @theelfyone who came up with a knitters’ blessing on Twitter during the week.
“There are all kinds of love in the world. Long-time love, a love that you can’t forget, faithless love, love you’re waiting for and immature love. Nevertheless, they’re all love. If I meet all of the 12 men, will I have 12 different kinds of love?”
…To anxious young women, I want to say what I wish more older women had said to my generation: Relax, enjoy the journey and do not worry about the future. There are no wicked witches. It is all good. Really, really good.
”Seawalls destroy beaches,” said Orrin H. Pilkey Jr., a Duke University geologist. In a recent study of scores of sites on the Atlantic Coast, Dr. Pilkey and his colleagues found that beach width on stabilized beaches was dramatically lower than on beaches with no sea walls. Many of the stabilized ”beaches” had no beach at all.
In our eyes and smiles
She has travel away many times
The heart of the story lies in an exchange with Morry's daughter Julie, shortly after he's had a stroke:
And so the reaper reaped himself,
Let’s start with the summer case. If you’re already part of the club then you’ll be receiving yours through the post very soon - hold on to those bottles (or at least make some notes so you can join in when we get to those that you can’t help but drink)! If you haven’t signed up but would like to, don’t worry it’s not too late, have a look here. The summer case runs from July through to the end of September, so I’ll post a running list of bottles by week at the end of June and then the first bottle post will happen in the first week of July. My post will have some thoughts and opinions on the chosen bottle, and then it’s over to you guys to tell me how wrong you all think I am in the blog comments section.
We will announce the Top 3
strawberry shortcakes
When the college’s controversial pacifist founder and principal, Greville Liddicote, is murdered, Maisie is directed to stand back as Detective Chief Superintendent Robert MacFarlane and Detective Chief Inspector Stratton spearhead the investigation. She soon discovers, however, that the circumstances of Liddicote’s death appear inextricably linked to the suspicious comings and goings of faculty and students under her surveillance.
I started with a photo of a Tokyo train station by Kirk Pedersen, from his book Urban Asia. I was attracted to the gritty colors in contrast the the saturated brights. The strong lines of the ductwork on the left side gave the composition a sense of movement.
I hope it was just a dream and nothing more.
Six-hundred.
I've wanted to use pinwheels as an embellishment on one of my pages forever. The pinwheel journaling sticker from the Celebrate Life kit inspired me to give it a try. I googled pinwheel tutorials and they have tons of videos available on YouTube. It's easier than you think!
Also… It seems I'm really changing a lot of stuff and well the whole concept of the Electric Pick Ture Box so it might take a while actually!!! So if while I'm doing these changes you win the lottery and run out of ideas of what to use all that money for and then suddenly remember that everything I paint, if it's not in my sketchbook, is most definitely for sale… Just write to me with your questions about any piece you see here on the Plog!!
too, the people of Benue
What’s your opinion of the local music scene?
¼ cup vegetable oil
Mildred arrives at the restaurant, where a couple of waitresses are laying the tables and Wally pops up to show off the lights he managed to install in the pie display case. Mildred’s so overcome by his ability to screw in a lightbulb she offers him free dinner with second helpings.
(Editing by David Adams and Lisa Shumaker)
Shape into small round dumplings about 1.5”/4cm in diameter. If they seem too wet, add some of the reserved breadcrumbs or even a small bit of flour. If they’re too dry, add a bit of stock. Then simmer the dumplings gently in rich chicken stock (I flavor my stock with roasted garlic and cumin) until they float and are cooked through (about 10-15 minutes).
Jamie Oliver and Hugh Fearnley-Whittingstall both worked at the River Cafe.
Anyway, now that we've had a couple of days of veg'ing out in front of the TV, we're moving again. The Motel 6 up in Orlando is our next destination, being both cheaper and less in the line of fire (we hope). If the rains aren't too bad -- and so far they haven't been -- we might even hit Walt Disney World. The girls just have to agree on which park to visit.
Necklace- Claire’s
This wool tent dress has a relaxed fit with careful pleats and argyle-patterned seaming. The fabric is thick on this one adding some warmth and a little bulk. One could pull of a range of sizes and have it still work. I am wearing a 6 which fits well in the shoulders and bust. It has pockets and slightly puffed sleeves. Another ebay find!
Loads more gardening this weekend - can I show you?
Minis
Cut to the apartment of college student Dana (Kristen Connolly), a cutesy redhead packing for a weekend trip to the countryside. We soon meet the rest of the participants: Jules (Anna Hutchison), the hot blonde; Curt (Chris Hemsworth), the super jock; Holden (Jesse Williams), the brains; and Marty (Fran Kranz), the pot-smoking idiot. CABIN displays its cleverness in a lot of subtle ways, like how the super jock isn’t a doucebag or an idiot, or the virgin isn’t really a virgin, or the nerd isn’t a dork or geek. What we’ve got is a group of college kids that feel like actual kids, and not types.
Needless to say, when Given comes to your city, be on the way to pick it up ASAP!! This is an excellent Liqueur. Something new and something very fresh. Check out Given on these social networks...
In fact, there are more people than ever being diagnosed with this unwanted disease. You will find that you will feel much better once you get help and get the problem under control. If you do not have any medical coverage, there are free clinic that will give you the help that you are looking for with the genital warts. You will get medicine and even some advice to help you control this nuisance.
Now you'll understand why I've been absent from the Land of Blog for a while and apologies to all my blog mates for not visiting.
3. Add the wine to the saucepan, bring to a boil ad then reduce the heat to medium low. Add the heavy cream, shrimp, anise seeds, anise extract and cook in sauce for 5 minutes. Remove from the heat and add the chopped parsley. Add salt and pepper, if necessary.
So intrigued was I, that yesterday, as I sat outside the building waiting for my I.T. class (more on that little gem later), I saw him go in and called out to him. We chatted for a bit, and it turns out he lives up round my area - the ghetto, as other people seem to see it as, due to its outskirtish nature and mainly student population. Half way through our conversation, I asked him if he knows my name, because I don't remember his.
1- Full Size 50″ Tripod (No More Fuzzy Memories!)
Stay Tuned to watch the Bus undergo a massive face lift!
Meanwhile, the Washington Post has taken to calling Social Security that all-purpose epithet "welfare" that is "slowly and inexorably crowding out the rest of government" and and called opposition to cuts in the program result of "self-centered, shortsighted intransigence" among seniors.
It's Cask Ale Week. It's about good beer, cask beer, real ale, whatever (thanks Adrian). It's a week that is a celebration of one of our finest British foodstuffs, and so what I want you all to do is stop reading this blog, writing your blog, watching Glee on the iPlayer (whatever Glee and the iPlayer might be, I'm not quite sure), and go to the pub and drink some cask ale. And be thankful.
Be sure to visit our amazing SCRS designers for more peeks of Mama Charlotte. Sparkle will be giving away a Mama Charlotte rubber stamp to one lucky person! For a chance to WIN, you need to visit and comment on all of the designers' Mama Charlotte blog posts (listed below) and then leave a comment on the SCRS blog post. You have until midnight EST tonight to comment.
But that's all silliness and name-calling. What this is really about is wasting your money. When this contract comes up, when the courtesy contract comes up, whenever the PLCB spends on consultants or signage or harassment of former Board members, the stock answer is always that it's not the taxpayer's money, they're a self-supporting agency and that their 'expenses' come out of the money they 'make' selling booze.
My RSI journey began when I became a sub-editor in the 1990s, when desktop publishing loused up a lot of limbs and livelihoods. I’ve battled this keyboarder’s curse ever since.
Whatever happens, I will end up with a nice guest room and it is about time it came about. I have been living with that spare bedroom as a junk room for a long enough time. I'm excited about having a bedroom that I can use for the occasion if someone wants to spend the night. It's been a major drawback not to have that and to always have to apologize for the state of it.
Thanks so much, Stephanie! If you would like to see more of Stephanie's artwork, please visit her at:
I know he’s not an actor, but I don’t think this character: a bodyguard, confidant, chauffeur, whatever to Christian has any lines. I’m not even sure that’s the character’s correct name, but I don’t care enough to double check.
press intently...red crescent moons anchoring
Jordan Hasay made her college debut that weekend as well and finished 6th at the Dellinger Invite. Jordan ran as the Oregon #2 to Alex Kosinski. Neither the Oregon Men or Women looked as good as expected. My NCAA favorite on the mens side this year is Oklahoma State. In addition to German Fernandez, Ryan Vail (All-American last year) returns for his final season and transfer Girma Mesecho (All American last year as a Frosh at Auburn) is eligible and ready to go. Colby Lowe should step up from last year and help the team win the title. Look for the Chris Derrick led Stanford team to challenge as well. On the women's side, I don't see any team capable of beating last years champ Washington.
And the legends of the green chapels
Another overlooked classic that I read this month was The Talented Mr. Ripley by Patricia Highsmith. Certainly, this was a very different kind of novel, but also engrossing in its way. I should pick up more books from that era. I really love Highsmith’s writing style, a style that I’m afraid might be going extinct.
The language in HR 4089 simply allows these 41 trophies to be brought into the United States. It does not re-open any additional polar bear importation. It does not remove current protections on polar bears. The 41 bears in question are already dead.
Pause for a moment and really embrace this tragic moment.
In this time of great change no one can predict the future, but several hundred years from now I think what it means to be a Christian will probably be very different than what we think it means now and we will be better for it.
Can we not just call them models rather than black models? In the same way that magazines have tended to fetishize plus size models instead of incorporate them as a normal part of their fashion aesthetic, if you're a model and you happen to be black it seems you are relegated to being a kind of flavour of the month, like a pouty, smiley or tough look. Notice something else? All of the three latter characteristics are completely changeable for other models: the pouty ones can stop pouting, the smiley ones can frown instead and the tough girls can grow their hair out. Not much you can do about your skin colour if it suddenly becomes unfashionable. And as That's Not My Age succinctly put it on her blog: "Can models not be black and pouty, black and smiley, black and tough?"
Classically trained to the level of masters in the art of baking in their homeland of Switzerland, Theodore and Marie dreamed of opening a bakery of their own…
Then it’s off to Central Search, oh joy, there were as many Smiths Industries x-ray units that are in Terminal 1 in Heathrow, only squeezed into a quarter of the space. I have never in my life experienced such a crush; it was panic and shout, with a mix of bad temper thrown in too. Too hot and sweaty by now as well. Nice!
Bright Purples and Oranges﻿
That, unfortunately is the sound that my boots were making in ankle deep mud this afternoon as I was shovelling a dam into place on the vacant block next door.
“You’re still trying to talk with a chicken?” asked Arik from the secret door as his eyes tried desperately to pierce the darkness of beyond the opening. It seemed to him that the darkness there was darker than shadow should be somehow. Darker than dark, even, were such a thing possible. He did not particularly like the look of it. He was momentarily tempted to put his hand through the opening and touch the darkness, but instead turned around and walked back to the group as they huddled around Bantum and the chicken. He bristled his beard and said, “I can’t believe you are talking to a chicken!”
Flyball is a fun sport for the whole family not just the dog. It requires very little physical effort by the owner so it’s a great sport to do with your kids and if you are unable to get around on an agility course or find doing Frisbee challenging with your dog. Flyball just might be your sport.
This gorgeous butterfly is from our new Stamp TV duo, Believe In Yourself. It is such an elegant design, especially with lots of shimmer and pearls! This mitered corner layout was inspired by Sketch 375. After coloring the butterfly with Copic markers, I gave it a touch of Stickles and sculpted its wings to dry in a curved position. Then I sprayed the entire card front with Clearsnap Smooch Spritz. Finally I added some pearls to its body, wings, and antennae. It is so pearly and shimmery IRL!
Kennedy
Get rid of Adam and Ceelo
What I find to be so smart is all of the open shelving added. This allowed her to pop in smaller containers for all those small craft items, that are right within arms reach. Plus, many of the storage options are clear, allowing her to know exactly what she is going for! If she would have left those cabinets in place, sure, she could have stored a ton of items, but it wouldn't have made her time in the space as effective.
To marry well is the note that strikes more clearly on the brain of the débutante's mother than on the ear of that interesting person herself. A girl starting in life feels all the world is before her where to choose. She gives, indeed, too little thought to the subject. She comes fresh from the schoolroom into the crowded drawing-room, thinking only how best to enjoy herself. The thought of marriage, if near, is yet so far, that it hardly interferes with her pleasure in the waltz, the theatre, or the eternal afternoon tea.
Sentiment - Dawn Bibby Woodland Friends
Yea, the rudeness is really gonna get me to send you $2000. I like the use of "cos". Do they not know that American's don't say that? Sloppy scammers. Do your research before launching an international fraud operation, assholes.
I knew her prescription was coming due for a refill. Or shall I say, new prescription written. Thing is another one of the hurdles I will be dealing with, every month, every year, that she is on medicine. The classification of these types of drugs that are prescribed for ADHD, cannot have a refill, by law. So every month I have to call the pediatrician and request a new prescription be written and then wait 48 hours for it to be ready for my pickup. It cannot be called in to the pharmacy.
December arrived and along with it came sunshine (wow!) and very little rain. Being able to see the mountain during sunset is always a nice treat. I finished a ton of creative ventures, I needed a break from school and time to let my creativity take it's course.
That soccer guy, tasty.
You had better believe we'll use this prayer at this year's annual Assumption Feast (scheduled for August 19 at the Nativity of the Blessed Virgin Mary, just outside of Cashton, WI. If you're in our neck of the woods, e-mail me about joining us for a sung High Mass, procession, and feast afterwards featuring abundant victuals and homebrew.)
PLEASE READ THIS! MY LIFE DEPENDS ON IT!
A fitting tribute to one of my favourite writers, W.G. Sebald, this experimental documentary about landscape, history, art, life and loss offers a unique insight into one of the most powerful, mysterious and brilliant books of the 20th century. It’s also soundtracked by The Caretaker, aka James Leyland Kirby. Joy.
Who ever thought that this girl ~ the original "sweet tooth" herself would actually reach this goal. My sweet treat now is a Medjool date (pit removed), filled with goat cheese and two almonds ~ delicious!
Turn on, tune in, drop out, roll over, etc. Wednesday Sept. 15, 11:15 a.m. PDT. KCRW 89.9 FM in L.A.; watch and listen at kcrw.com worldwide.
There’s a lot of new characters in this season, which is hardly surprising. Obviously some fall into stereotypes, but for the most part I think they’re originally enough to get more than a passing score. To add to that, the main character is original and very funny, probably even more so than the first season. His “assistant” isn’t going to gather any points, but I feel she works well as his sidekick. In retrospect I kind of view them as a Manzai team – where she is “the straight man” and he’s “the funny man”. They don’t really fit into those role that well at all, but just very vaguely. I mean, he does and says some crazy things every now and then, which she, “the straight man”, counters with normality.
Farley eviscerates David Levy’s argument swiftly, so not much for me to add on that point, except to say that when a sentence like this appears in print, it should be a clue that the author is just making shit up:
In that moment I feel real, Absolute. In that sea of probability in which I have been swimming I have, at last, found solid ground to stand on. I am happy. I know I will keep this moment in my heart forever, yet still I find myself wanting to preserve it. To suspend it like a fly in amber so that it will last a hundred million years. Then, when our genetic odyssey ends (as it surely will) and there are no humans left, the next dominant species may find it, and examine it. Perhaps they will be smart enough to understand love.
"S - ex -- SEL-L-ls..."
If you are big on activity and have a lot of meetings with customers you will be perceived as a hard-working sales person. If you don’t sell as much as the stars is just factors beyond your control and easily shunned into a corner.
When I make it to Charlottetown, Winners is my first stop. I'm elated when I've, by chance, caught a new shipment day but most days it's been well picked over and I leave feeling a little deflated. Nothing like getting your hopes up and having them dashed! :)
Empress Theodora favored the monophysite views taught by Eutyches the Archmandrite (an archmandrite was the head of a monastery or several monasteries). Monophysites deny that Christ had both a divine nature and human nature.
who crave for sustenance
I read an article that your brain benefits more when you write longhand than when you type, so it’s healthier for the brain to write longhand. I constantly hear writers say that they prefer longhand because it seems like they’re more connected, that writing feels more intimate when they do it longhand. However, writing longhand gets me lazy to transfer it to the computer, that’s not good for me.
for this 4th Tuesday of the month!
But I think there’s something to be said for tossing a rival in the hero’s way, in addition to the main baddie. You kind of get it with Rowling’s Potter vs Malfoy rivalry (though I don’t think it’s pushed to the extent that it could be). Malfoy’s not the Big Bad (that’s Voldy’s job) but he serves to hamper Potter on a day-to-day basis. Or to use another example, Indiana Jones kept bumping up against his rival Belloq, even though the main baddies were (of course) Nazis.
And , of course to keep things running smoothly in the kitchen, and to regale me with his witty observations when I pop back to the kitchen to check if all is well, the butler with the best dry remarks has to be... well, Niles of course!!!
Therefore, she was unable to marry Franklin.
She was born to fly.
Of course, the problem with responding with such ‘vigour' is that one is left fairly breathless when something serious or profound does in fact take place. The ANCYL is a case in point. So infused with vitriol is its rhetoric, it is almost impossible to distinguish their position on those more fundamental developments from their position on some trifling, petty concern.
Being the cheap bastard that I am, I opted out of all of the fun stuff which was just wonderful every time Anna saw the train pass by. There’s only so many times you can tell your child the train is full and that we won’t fit before she starts giving you the side-eye and totally doubting you as a mom. And then the mom guilt sets in and you really feel like a piece of crap for not spending an extra $15 for the three of you to ride on the train for a whopping 5 minutes.
We were filming the pilot episode for A&E’s Longmire last March, when the director, Chris Chulack, turned to me and said, “Do you want to be in this scene?”
In the early 1990s, action movies were close to the pinnacle of perfection. They had everything a man movie needs: absurd plots, half-hour long gunfights, ultra-cool synth soundtracks, etc. There was one thing missing though. The decade that gave us Rambo, John McClane, every Arnold role, and all those generic Van Damme movies had few notable black dudes starring in their own action flicks. In stepped Wesley Snipes to save the day for Hollywood, and for a few years, he almost A-list material. Today, poor old Wesley might be locked up in prison for not paying taxes, but in 1992 he was legit. And it was this movie right here that kicked off an eventful career of ass-kicking, drop-kicking, face-punching and tax evasion - Passenger 57.
Q: Jesse is the male protagonist in CHINA LAKE. He's in a wheelchair. Unlike Jeffery Deaver's Lincoln Rhyme, you were very specific about how he could/could not have sex. You also cover how someone in a wheelchair is received in daily life. How did you research this? Why did you decide to make Jesse less mobile? How do you make sure that he isn't a passive character?
The internet of things wouldn’t only be used by humans, either — things could communicate with each other. For example, your car could communicate with other cars and traffic signals, so that the light always turns green just as you arrive — or, really, with fully autonomous and networked cars, you wouldn’t need signals at all; cars would just automagically avoid each other by braking and accelerating at the right time. Fridges could communicate with supermarkets and arrange food deliveries; ditto natural gas and oil and septic tanks. With an internet of things, we could tack the word “smart” onto almost everything; smart cars, smart homes, smart supermarkets, and even smart cities.
Today is the last of our YELLOW series - we will begin with a new colour next Monday. Love colour!
It doesn't get more All-American than small town celebrations. It also doesn't get more All-American than a couple of garden creations I canned up this year, Homemade Ketchup and Dill Pickle Relish. Facing baskets and baskets of tomatoes to use, I added Homemade Ketchup to my tomato repertoire. A friend dropping off a black trash bag full of various sizes of cucumbers led to a day of pickle making and some jars of Dill Pickle Relish. It's been a busy canning year for me, and my pantry shelves will soon be full of lots of All-American staples for winter.
- John McCoy: basse
Truthfully, episode 2 was more of the same and didn’t really move the story along. Instead, it attempted to make us believe that it really is possible for these two characters to be stuck in such an unintentional scandal.
05. Tiny Tim's Search For The Magic Princess
Matteo "thug-nasty" Yazge
Makes about 10-12 main dish servings
cliff. The big moron fell off. Why didn't the other one?
Thiamine deficiency is similarly rare, except among the severely malnourished and alcoholics. A significant depletion causes a condition known as beriberi, which can cause weakness, leg spasms, poor appetite, and loss of coordination.
Also known as 'The Best Pie I Have Ever Made'.
Measure out scant teaspoons of dough and shape into balls. Drop balls one at a time into sanding sugar, tossing and turning to coat completely. One baking sheet is full, place in freezer for 5-10 minutes (chilling the dough helps the cookies keep their cute shape in the oven). Bake cookies for 10-13 minutes.
then add 2/3 cup of water all at once.
through family
North East. 0.
“$25 a piece.”
Tendulkar’s greatness lies beyond his spectacular numbers, beyond his breath-taking strokeplay, beyond his towering records and even beyond his mind numbing consistency. The only measure of his true greatness is the ease with which he has shouldered the expectations of a cricket crazy nation for such a long period and with such amazing grace. From the prodigious 16-year old facing Wasim and Waqar on a torrid Faisalabad pitch to the dynamic 38-year old scoring an ODI double ton in Gwalior; from the determined 19-year old smashing Hughes and Reid in Perth to the overpowering 30-year old uppercutting Akhtar in Durban; Tendulkar has delivered series after series, year after year, decade after decade with amazing consistency. No other batsman has scored with this consistency over this long a period, playing so many international games. Even today, when his failures are magnified and often not tolerated, this Indian colossus continues to further his legend.
1 pound dried fettuccine
'EVERYONE.'
8. Place pan on the top rack and in the middle of a preheated oven at 325 degrees F and bake for one hour and 15 minutes.
Wow, aren’t I a hick?
This week's ingredients are:
Grapeseed or olive oil for browning the meatballs
You see, I was lucky enough to win a book in a giveaway held by Lizzy (one of the month's hosts), namely Eugen Ruge's In Zeiten des abnehmenden Lichts (In Times of Diminishing Light). The giveaway was for the shortlist for the 2011 Deutscher Buch Preis, the German equivalent of the Man Booker Prize or the Prix Goncourt, and my choice turned out to be the eventual winner - so I was expecting something very good indeed :)
Far up the corridor and around two bends and through a secret door Hermel and Johan stared down the long corridor in the direction of the of the roaring, now mercifully ended.
Phoebe can fly out over the box, or out the balcony.
What is your favourite aspect of Zed?
However, since I first read the above earlier today, my thoughts have veered away from pure considerations of the indoor smoking issue.
But the South is not only influential through its artistically bent sons and daughters, its culture is inspiring. The South is an important setting. Beth Henley’s Pulitzer Prize-winning Crimes of the Heart, for example, is set in Hazlehurst, Mississippi and involves a trio of sisters from a dysfunctional Southern family. Even more well known is Robert Harling’s Steel Magnolias which was adapted into a film of the same name. Taking place solely within the confines of Truvy’s Beauty Shop in Natchitoches, Louisiana, the play revolves around a few months in the lives of the female staff and clientele. Even musicals have sprouted from incidents in Southern history such as Adam Guettel’s Floyd Collins (based on the death of amateur spelunker Floyd Collins who died after getting stuck in a cave near Mammoth Cave, Kentucky), Jason Robert Brown’s Parade (based on the trial and execution of Leo Frank, a northern Jew, who was accused of the murder of 13 year-old Mary Phagan, a young factory worker in Atlanta in 1913) and Kander and Ebb’s The Scottsboro Boys (based on the landmark case of nine African-American men accused of raping two white women in Alabama in 1931).
I walked into my house one evening after a very hard day at work to find my house UPSIDE DOWN! My DH had been busy studying and my son had his friends over. My immediate thought was " When is that cleaning lady coming....she's fired!" Only to realize that I AM that cleaning lady....Groan! I put down my purse and made my way to the kitchen to start supper thinking "When is that gourmet chef coming to make my dinner" only to be hit by the reality that I AM that chef.....Groan! As I was groaning and grumbling and feeling unappreciated, my 8 year old son came into the kitchen and here is how the conversation went.
The Constitution is there to do one thing: protect God-given rights. That’s what makes America different than every other country in the world. No other country in the world has its rights — rights based in God-given rights, not government-given rights.
-You’ll just make the opponent pretty mad and that’s not what pvp is made for
The Iowa Scale provides an outline to help parents gather the right information like school history, assessment of ability, aptitude and achievement, school and academic factors, developmental factors, interpersonal skills and resources for support.
We visited a few historical sites while in the city – the Santa Calina Monastery, one of the most important religious historical sites in all of Peru. Because the Monastery for nuns is so extensive (20,000 sq. meters) we spent over 2 hours poking in and out of the simple or extravagant living quarters, apartments and dormitories of nuns of the Domincan Second Order. Approximately 20 nuns still live in the monastery founded in 1580.
This weeks challenge is to look at what are you actually TAKING up? What are you giving yourself? Are you learning something new? Taking up a new sport? Giving yourself a social life?
2-Steve Sulkin-Elmhurst (York)-14:19
It was strange, not giving an Irish concert this year. I felt like I should have been hauling harps and music and CDs and tickets and cleaning my house and baking Guinness chocolate cake to serve at the after party. I should have been advertising and promoting and writing news releases and being on the radio. Instead, it was this lovely evening. A lovely crowd, just like an Irish pub.
So God help me, I reached in, grabbed it, and threw it to one side. Which was a bit, um, splashy.
We need instead, as a society, to stop killing our children, build up our families, live more simply, give more generously and focus our priorities on providing for our dependents, especially the older generation which fought for our freedom in two world wars, provided for our health, education and welfare, and left us the legacy of wealth, comfort, peace and security which we have squandered and taken for granted.
Please join us for an incredibly special evening to benefit Village School Foundation featuring live music, film and Q&A with celebrated filmmaker & musician Tinh Mahoney! The Village School Foundation is a 501(C)3 non-profit organization that empowers children with education by building schools and giving out scholarships.
“First Understanding, Then Adjustment”
We got chatting away and quite amazingly enough James volunteered to take me to the brewery premises, gammy leg and all (as I said - beer people are great). It's only a couple of minutes away from the Cricket Club in the midst of an industrial estate in Livingston with (at present) very little to mark itself from the surrounding buildings except a small Alechemy sign.
"Tape and Bill Wells first met in Stockholm while Bill was performing his music with The Concretes and Jens Lekman. Both artists were aware of each other’s work and upon this first meeting they spoke of collaborating together on a recording.
Many ask what others say on 2nd chances. The bottom line is you should always follow your heart and head. Put the two together and then look for that gut instinct. But can it really be that easy? Sometimes it just doesn’t feel like it can be. So lets look at those times too.
And there you have it, a Shabby Lace Pouch for you to fill with whatever you fancy. I made a bigger one for Leyla to put all of her tea set stuff in too and it worked brilliantly :)
Stem and chop strawberries and bananas. Place in blender or magic bullet (in batches if using Magic Bullet). Pour rice milk over fruit and blend. For a colder beverage, use frozen strawberries or ice. Serve.
Make stupid excuses. Either be honest or be quiet.
Anyways, I felt so inspired I have more motivation to just hurry up and finish college already.
These same benefits extend to developing infrastructure which supports the arts and the people that engage in creativity. Supporting the arts is more than just buying a ticket to Michael Buble. This might not result in a tangible commodity that can be traded on Wall Street, but it just might make people’s lives better anyways. Why is that such a bad thing? And why shouldn’t it be something we aspire to? Do we look back in history and say “wow, really great slave trade they had in Ancient Rome,” or do we admire their creative accomplishments? Do we place value on their gladiatorial entertainment industry, or on their collective creativity?
● Encourage suppliers to improve their water conservation, quality
And I have a confession to make. Melinda's original recipe says specifically to NOT use Minute - or instant - rice. And....errrrr....I do. I'm a complete spaz when it comes to cooking the real stuff (it comes out crunchy every time), so I cheat. And since I don't know what it tastes like with "real" rice, I can't really compare, but I still think it tastes pretty amazing. :) So do whatever you're comfortable with.
I wish my excitement for this show could back to the way it was in the first half of the season because “What We Have Is Worth The Pain” has it’s moments but the writing is too inconsistent at this point and it’s looking less and less likely that this show will deliver a satisfying conclusion to these chain of events or go further than this series.
Possible solution: Find a way to combine old and new material in such a way, like a themed mini-collection, that would appeal to old and new readers alike. Yeah. Guess I have some work to do.
hymh: i've read that you've been obsessed with music from an early age. do you find that being a music fan helps you be a better musician? i ask this because i'm often amused by actors who always say, "i don't have time to watch TV or go to the movies," as it seems counter-productive with their craft. it's the same with writers who refuse to read outside their genres. what types of music are you currently into?
The evil king of all refined grains is high fructose corn syrup (HFCS). The amount of refined sugar we consume has declined over the past 40 years, but we’re consuming almost 20 times as much HFCS. According to researchers at Tufts University, Americans consume more calories from HFCS than any other source. It’s in practically EVERYTHING. It increases triglycerides, boosts fat-storing hormones, and drives people to overeat and gain weight. Adopt my zero-tolerance policy, and steer clear of this sweet “poison.”
We just organised a date to the pub, but I still dressed up a little.
-6 Month toys that light up or make sound. The kid loves music.
Rich Benjamin of the non-partisan research center Demos suggests in a New York Times op-ed column that in gated communities “physical seclusion then worsens paranoid groupthink against outsiders”, making people actually feel less secure than their surroundings would suggest.
The song title is really perfect for this sound, even some slight gish-like moments with a screechy wah solo, breaking as high as this treble will let it.
● Operations Manager, Transportation Industry, 12 Years
Did you know that Tiesto cannot play any instrument what so ever?
Remember it all. Remember everything they did. Remember how close those evil sons of bitches came.
canola oil
Tony Hawk's Sk8landTony Hawk’s American Sk8land
2 bling center rubon flower stickers
In the seventeenth century, Japan began farming seaweed. The Japanese and other Asian cultures used kelp to treat uterine problems, genital tract disorders, and kidney, bladder, and prostate ailments.
From Eco-Libris’ analysis of the iPad2, the break-even point at which the device has a lower carbon impact than an equivalent production of print books is 14. A widely cited study by research firm Cleantech Group found that the carbon emitted in the life cycle of an Amazon Kindle is fully offset after the first year of use, as long as the owner downloads more than 22 books in a year, and additional years of use result in net carbon savings equivalent to an average of 168 kilograms of carbon dioxide.
Looking forward to hanging with the kids! More info upon my return!
My cat Willow is so secure that she is practically spook-proof but every once in awhile she will begin to exhibit alarm over something, and, if I can catch that moment and say to her, "Scarwy" she calms right down. Acknowledging and validating her trepidation seems to negate her tension. It is with this in mind that I jump aboard The Poetry Bus for the first time. This week's host is Argent, author of Delusions of Adequacy, and her prompts were to write something funny, i.e., "Excursion to the Comedy Store," or to write about unrequited love, i.e., "Tunnel (of unrequited) Love" - or a combination of both if desired. The Poetry Bus is sponsored by Totalfeekineejit, who lists in his sidebar the Poetry Bus Global Tour Dates. That is about all I know right now about The Poetry Bus, except I selected the unrequited love idea and .......this is a verwy scarwy ride for me!
I could barely took the final product pictures and I wanted to add some frosting on top but everybody was hungry and they ate them just like that but I can proudly say that they loved them and there are no muffins left.
will view our lives
Waiheke Island
So, first thing’s first: let me continue showing you what I did during my trip to the Loire Valley! After leaving Amboise, we headed out to visit the Chateau de Chenonceau. I could name drop for some time about the owners of the castle throughout its extensive history, but instead I’ll just let this little statistic do the talking: after Versailles, it’s the most visited chateau in France! How’s that for piquing your interest?
Spiders…their 8 long, hairy legs, watchful eyes, paralysing venom and their delicately spun death traps are a great source of fear for many people. What is more scary than a death machine created by Nature that in my opinion has more intelligence than the average human?
DD Fresh Fruits $10.00
SG
So, tell your friends! (If you repost the links between now and midnight EST on Sunday, in two places on the internet, she'll give you a query critique! See her blog for details.) Now check out those authors. This is a celebration, after all. ;)
There are many dogs in the army and navy. Many are working dogs, but some provide the therapeutic benefit of interacting with a dog during high stress periods. This is one of the reasons service people tend to bond so much with their canine partners.
And to gain a readership for my first novel, (and to learn to write) I created an alternate Star Trek Universe called Kraith, and at one time had 50 creative Star Trek fans contributing to the stories in that universe. Those stories were published, scattered over many fanzines, and then collected in Kraith Collected which went many printings on paper. The stories are now posted online for free reading.
According to the guidelines, Nadya, who is 33, falls under the two-embryo category. However, Dr. Grifo notes that these are guidelines, not laws. “Eight babies born at once is a failure of our treatment. Our goal as practitioners is to help these patients have a single healthy pregnancy, because those pregnancies have the best outcome.”
I encouraged him to bring the clothes and toys into his room but instead more and more toys got dragged into our living room. When it was time to sit down and eat his breakfast, his favorite of ‘waffles and cream’, the battle started. Normally, a good tactic is to put a clock in front of him so he can see how much time he has. Today we didn’t do that because we were not thinking about the exact occasion we had to leave like we do every day for school. That was a Bad choice on my part. I should have showed him the exact time he needed to have eaten and gotten dressed by. Then we should have marched out the door. Unfortunately, we had to pack our suitcases and pack the car.
Our lives are a unique juxtaposition between two worlds, life and death and between two states of being: incredible, immeasurable sadness balanced against the will and pressure to live again and find joy.
The most recent addition. I just added this bistro chair to the side of the entry table. I am low on flowers in the garden so I cut some of my fresh lavender and put it in this sweet small pitcher. It smells great too.
I have written a little question/discussion guide to go along with the book. I think that the book opens doors to talk about your own childhood, and the way your family is now. My goal is that the whole family could be involved in the discussions, even if the whole family isn't involved in reading it. For example, a four year old wouldn't be interested in the story, but could answer the question, "What was a really great day your family spent together?" Same goes with the husbands. If they want to be a part of reading aloud, or want to read the book on their own, great. Terry doesn't share my appreciation for children's literature, but he can still participate in the discussions when asked, "What is something that each member of your family does well?"
There isn’t enough life in me to fight this sorrow anymore
15: 1:15-1:20
The sun was shining for the first part but then a layer of low clouds moved in and I was reminded that it's not yet Spring.
Yesterday I received the coveted Versatile Blogger Award from Sandra over at She Can’t Be Serious. For those unfamiliar with this particular WordPress honor, it’s a way for avid WordPress bloggers to pat each other on the back while generating more hits. Recipients are supposed to list seven little-known facts about themselves and then spread the award around by providing links to twelve or fifteen (I’m not sure which it is) other bloggers’ sites.
Kalamari
Genevieve Cook came from not one but several distinguished families. Her father, Michael J. Cook, was a prominent Australian diplomat. Genevieve’s mother, born Helen Ibbitson, came from a banking family in Melbourne and was an art historian. Michael and Helen divorced when Genevieve was 10. Helen soon remarried into a well-known American family, the Jessups. With homes in Georgetown and on Park Avenue at various times, Philip C. Jessup Jr. served as general counsel for the National Gallery of Art, in Washington. The Jessups were establishment Democrats. Philip’s father had been a major figure in American postwar diplomacy.
What wonderful books did you get this week?
love tomato sauce & veggies....you will love it. I made it for my lunches & had it
With about 40kms to go, I was really getting tired. My speed was dropping on the climbs. I was concerned that I would get to the hotel, which was about 25kms from the finish, quite late. When it came to it, at Les Herbier, I turned off and cycled straight to the hotel rather than go to the Stage finish 6kms away. During the last few kilometres, I had been thinking about the fact that I had committed myself to doing this sort of mileage, day in, day out. The fact that I was carrying all this extra weight on my bike and having to get from one stage to the next, on my own was really playing on my mind.
This is an apt description of evangelicals as well who now increasingly view cardinal doctrines like the deity of Christ, a literal hell, the substitutionary atonement and the Second Coming as optional.
Now onto the HUGE blogiversary candy(S). Hold onto your hats everyone. It truly is MASSIVE and you are gonna want to win!!!
I was finally at peace.
I couldn’t leave Cape Town without paying a visit to Robben Island, the prison where Nelson Mandela spent 18 years of the total of 27 that he was imprisoned. This island is placed 12 kilometers away from Cape Town. Due to this isolation, it had previously been a hospital for people with leprosy and the mentally and chronically ill. In 1964, Nelson Mandela started his imprisonment years there, condemned because of his opposition to the racist apartheid regime. After more than 18 years in a tiny cell, he was transferred to two other different prisons until his release in 1990.
I read our convention guide and decided that I would attend the Oncology Certified Nurse breakfast. What drew me to the breakfast was the write up description about the guest speaker, Kyle Garlett. Kyle is a 4-time cancer survivor, he’s had a heart transplant, a hip replacement, and he now competes in iron man competitions!
Don't forget to check out all the links below and use the PROMO CODE TAD12 for the purchase you make to ensure you get the full percentage off you can get. When you are done and exhausted from all the fun, you will have hit the JACKPOT!
And there is plenty for the botany student to discover: Box Hill is nationally recognised as an important site for wildlife, statutorily protected as part of the Mole Gap to Reigate Escarpment Site of Special Scientific Interest (SSSI) and Special Area of Conservation, as well being part of the Surrey Hills Area of Outstanding Natural Beauty (AONB). The area is noted for numerous chalk grassland species including over a dozen species of orchid, as well as the Box (and Yew) woodland that gives the area its name. For entomologists, there are a wide range of insect species present including 40 out of the 58 native British butterflies.
Isabel did give him some beginner instruction…..
Scooter riding!....
Sometimes musicians email me. Emails are important if you want people to listen to your music. I don’t want to scare bands into not emailing me because honestly, I enjoy getting new music delivered into my inbox, howeverrrrr… Occasionally, I get some really bad emails. I realise it’s not an easy thing and I’m by no means saying I won’t listen to a band who doesn’t have a PR company emailing some really professional stuff out for them because to be honest, it’s nicer getting emails from the bands themselves as opposed to someone in a PR office. ANYWAY here’s a little guide that’ll hopefully help you on the road to writing a nice email to send to people.
Tensing Norgay
The Guild will continue to advocate on behalf of not only Denver Post staff, but Denver Post readers.
“Tigerli is really not normal!”
You might say, my situation just doesn’t let me even try to smile. Well, you remember that plastered smile you have seen before where you doubted the genuineness behind it. That will do. It may sound funny but that is a good start. Try it and keep at it. Before you know, you will have a genuine one on your face and this will be there to stay as you work through your issues, but now with a smile on your face! Moreover, now you are spreading it too.
The novel way my duffle coat sleeve
79. Curse of the Cat People (1944)
This is my latest creation...a covered box file in vintage pink paisley eiderdown fabric. I covered one recently in Kate Forman blue roses linen but forgot to photograph it and sold it at a fair. I decided to have another go but this time with vintage fabric. I'm afraid I cannot take all the credit as Andy helps with all the technical details like measurements, cutting the base out and attaching the ties at the front of the box. I'm rather pleased with it...what do you think?
Yet here I was sitting for 90 minutes entranced by this silent film. Listening to the pretty perfunctory orchestral music and watching the kind of acting that Robert De Niro wouldn’t be involved in. And then just when you think they’re going to turn on the talking you realise that you’re in for the long haul, the music plays on, the facial expressions and sweeping hand gestures continue and you wonder what you signed up for. I turned to my left at this point and my mate was napping.
TLB, looking over his shoulder: "She can't hear you."
Models: Georgia Frost, Shenay Carey,
The philosopher’s whet stone holds no answers.
1 Kings 10:14 -
Current AHA Membership
Are drunken jeers,
I used a Martha Stewart punch for the branches and made the curly sprigs by wrapping a thin piece of card stock around a small screw driver. I added some small pearls on the branches but you may not be able to see them.
The Frontline video from 1993(!) is still worth watching as it makes it abundantly clear what's going on. It astounds me what people will believe. Don't believe me? Try facilitating someone, fading back your grasp as far up and as lightly as you can go. Think of it as a fun game to play with your children and spouse. Then tell me you can ever watch someone holding another person's hand or arm and buy that the facilitator isn't co-opting it. In the meantime, watch the Frontline video with a skeptic's eye, and ask yourself how easy it would be to make parents believe their child was communicating and why even subconsciously a therapist or individual assigned to assist could facilitate and believe the communication is legitimate. We tend to discount misses, so parents wouldn't attend to when the child didn't correctly respond, assuming instead that the child is tired or being resistant before considering that the child hadn't communicated in the first place.
Add the lamb, pumpkin, stock, water and passata to the slow cooker. Cover and cook on low for 6 hours or until the lamb falls off the bone. Use tongs to remove bones and discard.
Neve Shalom, an "Arab-Jewish coexistence village," was selected by Waters due to his political convictions. In further evidence of his ideas on the Arab-Israeli conflict, the Pink Floyd frontman paid a visit to the separation fence in Bethlehem on Wednesday, where the iconic man of The Wall scrawled "no thought control" on the concrete panels of the barrier.
For those of you who don't know, I do have a shop over at Etsy.com where you can buy handmade jewellery. I have had the shop for some time now but haven't had the time to put as much into it as I wanted. Having some free time now I am planning to build up the shop and make my mark.
Dates: First 8 week session starts April 23rd through June.
Paul Muni The Life of Emile Zola
10) Take drinking water precautions (chlorine dioxide, etc.)
the hat to use as embellishments on them. I bought some more inexpensive pillows to use the stuffing out of.The antique hand stitched pillow case will go in my spring pile, to be determined what to do with it later.
Needless to say, I think they succeeded in their endeavor with their inclusion of 5,000 people and creation one of the most amazing lipsync videos I’ve ever seen.
The next 5 weeks are going to be crazy, I am scrambling to find a home in VA and finalizing all the moving details. I am so fortunate that my husband medically retired from the Air Force almost a year ago and that the military will be handling moving all of our belongs, boy does that take a load off of me.
I do not usually buy things like Fuzz Bandz, but as my children get older, I realize that they like to have the latest and hottest "thing". I think that Fuzz Bandz are a neat and creative item. My daughter loves them, I think a LOT of other kids will too! If you think your kids will like 'em, check out the site: http://fuzzbandz.com/
I think, too, that Roo has been online, chatting with the kids in my class. I’m positive she’s taking advantage of my inability to call her down when she’s doing something she’s not supposed to. Kitty Boss is just taking advantage of my being camped out on the daybed today by curling up with me.
“Fair foundations (are) laid whereon to build . . .”
His first book was a vision of an Edenic paradise with lush landscapes and ethereal moments like a cloud of dust exploding over an elephant’s head while the scenes in his second book become progressively emptier and drier. By the end, the trees have vanished and the water has evaporated.
Contractor: In order to qualify for the cash assistance that you applied for, you must take the job that you were offered.
Since it is Christ who is our life, it is He who is our life in community with others. We become our true selves in Him individually and collectively. Hidden in Christ we are revealed among God’s people to minister as priests and kings in our allotted place. This is where Jesus has placed us and not where we have presumed to place ourselves. You cant’ appoint yourself a pastor or teacher. The pre-requisite is that you have to ‘be’ one. We have authority when we are where Jesus has placed us. Not where our supposition has imagined us to be.
This journal entry was written while drinking Perrier in a Scottish pub. The bar man turns out to have been English not Scottish but after more than a week in France he felt like a compatriot. Sometimes my brain feels tired from straining to think in French. BTW the music in the bar was Dylan. It is rare to hear French music playing in a shop or cafe.
Boil potato until it turn soft. Remove skin and cut into bite sizes. Then put the potato aside.
I took all the little white squares home and designed this quilt on an early version of Electric Quilt. I just love the happy memories it evokes. I also have some not-so-happy memories of fitting all those triangles together. Just because blocks fit together on a computer screen doesn't mean they'll be easy to assemble in real life.
1 small pannier is for bicycle repair, maintenance, spares (3 tubes for bike, 1 for trailer), and clothing for weather like windbreakers and rain gear.
I wonder if wild birds are just on holiday all the time or whether they have a job to do? I’ve never seen a bird with a camera strapped to it’s neck or pulling a heavy suitcase… so I assume they all have a job to do…
5. World Championships Women’s 100 Final – Every once in a while a race comes together. The top athletes make it through the rounds, and you everyone performs up to expectations. This race was one such race. This event’s big three showed up and got it done as Jeter, Campbell Brown and Baptiste gave the crowd a show. Even defending champion Fraser Pryce, who hadn’t had a very good season, had a great run! If only every event would come together like this.
It sounds too good to be true? Well, the downside is the taste. It is downright sickly sweet. It reminds me of saccharin. It is very tricky to find not only the right product, but the right ratio of stevia to replace sugar in your favorite recipes.
over 950 players who made an appearance in one game, Paciorek is the best.
When I heard of others who have done this, I would think, "Wow, how crazy-brave of you!"
You can't just purchase a Buggati and have dog sh*t sent to you. "But you advertised a picture with this black Buggati!" "Oh, but I was actually selling the dog sh*t far off in the back there under the tires for $1,000,000." That's my cold humor for today,
How did I do it? Social media.
Bernbach was the son of immigrant from Eastern Europe, but the clichéd beginning of a success story ends here. Though Bernbach downplayed his early life in the Bronx, his father was actually a successful designer of women’s clothes, and Bill himself graduated from New York University in 1933. His self-confidence and ambition had carried him through a couple of early promotional jobs, but it was humility brought on by a year’s unemployment that seemed to get him his first job in advertising. When asked why he should be hired over the other applicants, Bernbach replied, “I don’t know why I should have it. I don’t even know if I’m equipped.”
3 T. brown sugar
So this week at MDUC we have this amazing challenge which I thought I would turn into a Christmas card. Well pretty much everything I am creating is being made to serve a dual purpose. hee hee! So today I paired up Snowman with Star with this snowflake circle frame that I can't find now but I did buy both from Magnolia-licious. It did make my card image bigger but I just love how it turned out. And it was a total fluke that I nailed the masking of the two images on the first shot!
Having said that, the truth has to be revealed and here is another gruesome incident of brutality, I wonder what the IGP, the mainstream media, and our Government leaders have to stay about this ? Professionalism ? Good Job ? Is this what the tax payers funds were used for ? To train thugs of these nature ?
“Of course there is very little, if any risk, of those same Cabindan separatists launching a second attack in South Africa. Their dispute with Angola’s government is too distant and too localised. Their attack was relatively amateur and involved nothing more sophisticated than the setting up of a machine-gun on the side of a road.
For those interested, here's the brief:
in the river for the elusive big fish, while Half Harris, the ‘half-wit’ brother he won’t acknowledge, fishes for random objects. But it is Half Harris who catches the fish. How often does it happen for you that a story you’re writing is different from what you planned? Did that happen at all with this novel?
A Charlie Brown Christmas
for the main image and the words. The stamps are
Again, as far as content goes I see absolutely no reason why a longer story can’t have unreal or surreal images. If the story’s good then it’ll work regardless of length – mostly, I think, because a story finds its own length. That’s paramount for me – I never set out to write something of a specific length; that’s for the story to decide.
(In cases involving contact or near-contact wounds, a special type of high-speed blood spatter, known as “backspatter” or “blowback”, will sometimes be detected on the exterior of the firearm. Examination for blood should be both visual and chemical, as the “backspatter” may not always be visible to the naked eye.)
The metro liens are so convenient and since I stayed beside a metro stop, it's really cheap to travel from hotel to city. Takes me around S$1.60 to and fro.
Bottomline on POS - Out of pocket depends on services received, more expensive premium than HMO, and more freedom of choice.
I would also like to run a block of the month/quilt-a-long type project but I'm not going to set that as a specific goal because it's waiting for creativity to strike first and you can't always rush that.
Remember you have to hop through both days to be eligible for the grand prizes.
Presenting the Honorable Rev. Edna Ametameh, Founder and Managing Director of Liberty Specialist Institute, West Africa, Koforidua, Ghana
For you are unforgettable…
You can find the answer in the foreword. The answer is no. She calls her husband a domestic god. I’m pretty sure we all know what that means.
prices subject to applicable fees.
I added a new tool with the change of medium. Two sizes of minnow nets were provided to scoop and collect water beads.
Paper: Well Worn DSP, Early Espresso and Naturals Ivory Card Stock
If you were asking yourself, "What on Earth is a 'ratio rally'?", the previous quote might give you a little insight. But if you're still scratching your head (and I don't blame you), allow me to explain. In a nutshell, beginning this past February, bloggers from all over the web have 'rallied' together each month to create gluten-free recipes based upon culinary ratios set forth by Michael Ruhlman. Each month is hosted by a different blogger, and each month features a different food item challenge, ranging from pancakes to pasta. All caught up?
I'm used to making lists, and systematically accomplishing things on the list. It's incredibly satisfying. However. If you make a list for someone else, someone who (perhaps) works full time and is your Lovable Beast of Burden, it can make you feel like a bit of a jerk. Especially when by the time your Lovable Beast of Burden comes home, you are SO TIRED and can not be on your feet for ONE MORE SECOND.
But well that thing we said about the hay and the sun n mint and salads.... Well!
No I am not talking about getting the job. I am talking about succeeding at your job.
Josh Matthews congratulates Alberto Del Rio. Del Rio said he doesn’t understand why he even had to be in this match, since he won the Number One Contendership match a few weeks ago on Raw. But after tonight, everyone will see how great he is.
- Seniors will suffer as Obamacare robs savings from Medicare in order to fund new government spending while threatening seniors’ access to care and ending Medicare as we know it.
I was quite nervous when I got my first pint of Batham's. It's made with Fuggles and Goldings hops, and contains invert sugar for a bit of extra sweetness. It tastes quite sweet. And very nice.
As Serge slipped into the bathroom, le FP muttered something about having to make a phone call and he quickly disappeared off to the hotel lobby with a grin on his face.
While fooling around on Twitter the other day I came across this blog by Paul Corbett talking about travel inspirations. EasyJet Holidays are asking travel bloggers the who, what, where and when as part of their Inspiration Initiative and given I find the idea quite interesting I thought I’d give it a go.
I salute the African National Congress. It has fulfilled our every expectation In its role as leader of the great march to freedom.
The truth in fact frequently differs, and whilst The Smiths had gained affections amongst a certain kind of British musician, and there were also a few eccentrics out there who suddenly had the easy means to distribute their wares, there were also plenty of bands heavily tuned in to the alternative rock being dispensed by the Paisley Underground and the Bunnymen, Julian Cope, REM, The Cure et al. Plenty of them also had bugger all money, so chose to stick their recordings out in decidedly handmade sleeves. That all of them seem to have fallen by the wayside when it comes to blogs and websites examining this sort of thing has more to do with the fickle finger of fashion than much else (unless their records came out on Creation Records, in which case all seems to be forgiven).
I was just told by one of my students that I can be scary. Apparently when actors or singers badly misbehave in fittings, I tend to look at them in a way that makes them shrivel up into husks of their former obnoxiousness. This makes my students cheer. But it apparently also makes them nervous when this look is directed near them.
There are many diet books that advise eating more fruits and vegetables, but Dr. Andrew Iverson, MD, says that your favorite fruit could be contributing to your growing waistline and even putting your at risk for diabetes and heart disease! Nature’s Diet ($24.95, Trilium Health Press, Tacoma, WA) explores the way what you eat can affect your energy, your memory, your mood, and even how you think. Certain foods can even make a child behave poorly and lose focus in school. This book explains why many of today’s most common health problems can be remedied. After seeing chronically ill patients every day in his practice, Dr. Iverson advises how to correctly feed yourself and detoxify from chemical waste to achieve amazing improvements in your health. Appetite for Reduction: 125 Fast and Filling Low-Fat Vegan Recipes by Isa Chandra Moskowitz ($19.95, Da Capo Press, softcover) is hot of the press demonstrates that a vegan diet can also be a very tasty one while also being low-fat and low-calorie. As she says, healthy vegan food can be so good that it appeals to a meat-eater. Editor's Note: One caveat, though. If you examine one’s teeth, you will note that some are specific to meat-eating, suggesting that we humans need both meat and vegetables.
When psychobilly was at its height in the eighties with the likes of Meteors, Guana Batz, and King Kurt leaving wreckage wherever they stomped with their infectious sounds, Demented Are Go was the one band that stood out and fired up these senses more than most. From the moment their debut album In Sickness And In Health put its nasty twisted fingers around the heart with slices of evil in the shape of tracks like Pervy In The Park and Rubber Love, devotion was inevitable so that even the mention of their name was inspiration for a deep malignant glow within.
PSS... I just returned to my seat from the bar where the train staff had a small celebration for my birthday. I was going to celebrate by myself with a bottle of wine but soon many people were participating. When I returned from the bathroom they had a small butter cake with 20 matches stuck in the top. So then I blew out the 20 matches/candles. I think that all of the passengers thought it was a good idea to have a birthday celebration. And I believe that they were pleased that I could understand and speak French. We went through many small bottles of wine and one person said that it was the first time an American had drunk good wine.
879. Ham & Cheddar Sandwich from Wawa (Limerick, PA) @ Home – 10:12 p.m.
Chapter Four - The Baba Yaga
Let us not forget that as we read last week –God so loved the world…. And this week we are confronted by the ruler/prince of this world will be under judgment. God’s judgment is not missing, but it always has the right timing. Three times in the gospel of John prior to this passage – Jesus states that the hour has not yet come for the Son of Man to be glorified, and yet now as the Gospel has reach the Gentiles and the world has pronounced judgment against Jesus. The time has come.
Surrounding us
Businesses do market research all the time to figure out what people want so that they can customize their product to suit the specific tastes of the consumers. These are the ideas I hope to bring into our PD program this year. Instead of the “sage on the stage” paradigm of the push model, I will be working with teachers to customize their own PD. Teachers will tailor their learning to suit their own demands and I will surrender control to the invisible hand.
Oh, and the dude who had the Washington Capitals? Yeah... an Alexander Ovechkin Rookie buyback autograph. A nice little $700 card right there. Thanks for coming out.
But, alas, I believe I will now embrace it.
Keshia
3) “If Edwardo Saverin then Mark Zuckerberg accompany to create if and only if Sean Parker who is not created the online social networking website.”
Is our maternal grandfather Śūra and his wife Māriṣa passing time auspiciously?
Here’s a link the article from NewsObserver.com. The article also says to expect a new location of The Pit in downtown Durham sometime next year.
I hope your fitness endeavors are going well and if they are anything like mine, you need some major motivation right now!
11. Spoon the buttercream icing into a piping bag (I used a disposable piping bag for this as it’s a pain to wash an oily piping bag). Pipe a decent amount of mixture into the middle of a macaron shell and sandwich together with the second shell.
I've been creating just a quick rough illustration
1. Weight Loss: Drinking water helps you lose weight better than anything else in the world. Water flushes down the by-products of fat breakdown. Drinking water can also reduce hunger and acts as an appetite suppressant so you’ll eat less. Water has also has zero calories.
Some blackbird on an outpost yew,
2010 Annual FMTM Awards Best Leading Actor in Drama/Action- John Lloyd Cruz
From here, everything gets insane. The stranger walks all over the townspeople, appoints the local dwarf to be sheriff, kicks people out of the hotel, and seduces any woman he wants. And that’s the least of the damage he does. (And a lot of it is darn funny.) As the film continues, viewers get glimpses of flashbacks where it seems the stranger is being whipped to death by the same people he now resides among. The entire things is very eerie, slightly ambiguous, and I kept wondering how in the heck these people didn’t recognize this man (and we never really get an answer, though I finally gathered that he’s the ex-marshall’s ghost, out for revenge). Eastwood has created a world off by itself that really sticks with you, and even haunts you. The strange sound editing adds to the atmosphere, and the cinematography also gets a thumbs up. Great movie. 9/10
I’m beginning to be more certain of that, also. With every game, Mark Fox looks more and more like an outstanding hire. And the fans! The fans showed up! We need that, people. We need you there for home games. On a night like tonight, the crowd factors in to the momentum as much as anything else, and our crowd was rocking the whole night. I heard someone compare it to games back in the Harrick days. Tonight gave you a glimpse of what UGA basketball can be.
Instead of shaking hands, Alex decides to go down the playful route. He becomes a little rigid, clicks the heels of his shoes together, and gives a bow from the waist with his hands behind his back. In regards to the deputy, he is either dense or is choosing to ignore the fact that the nurse and the patient apparently have a preexisting relationship and are trying to play ignorant about it while the deputy is present in an attempt to fool him. There is a good chance that he is choosing to ignore it.
Lonely, I call for you
My 3rd, couldn't speak intelligibly until this year, and the first time any of his teachers mentioned anything was 2nd grade. Then she asked if she wanted her to initiate a speech eval, and I never heard about it again after she agreed to do it. This was after I took him in to be tested at 4 through the school district, and they told me he wasn't delayed enough qualify for speech therapy.
o Ask yourself what you enjoy doing and what are opportunities to do more of this
One thing I loved, and still love, about Christmas is the tradition in my family of opening one present on Christmas Eve. For as long as I can remember, we have opened one pre-picked present on Christmas Eve and it is always the same thing – new pajamas. After the first years of pajamas, I came to realize that it was always going to be pajamas, usually hand made by my mom.
The length of glass lit up like the face of a skyscraper at night, powering on in a roar of illumination. The Citadel moaned answering my call from a long forgotten slumber. I could feel it awakening under my fingertips, welcoming me. I could hear life emerging beyond the glass, roused by the energies flowing through fractured black mirrors.
of her dreams. But the pictures told it all. The children
Ben's brother had to do the makeup exams for the Bac, and the results were posted online this morning, and he passed! Except now you can't see the results. So hopefully it wasn't a computer error and they posted everyone passed and then took it down when they realized what happened! But he did really well in the English makeup and only needed about one point in Math to pass, so I think he probably did. Still, we stressed the poor boy quite a bit waking him up early to tell him we saw his name only to have it taken down a few minutes later!
Of course, like its predecessor, the new Libyan State denies all knowledge of any torture taking place.
Dogfish Head India Brown
The Alliance for School Choice, a national education reform group, set up PACs in several states to elect state lawmakers. According to Wisconsin Democracy Campaign, American Federation for Children spent $500,000 in media in the lead-up to Wisconsin’s recall elections. AFC shares leaders, donors, and a street address with ASC. Bill Oberndorf, one of the main donors to the group, had been associated with Voyager Learning, an online education company, for years. A few months ago, Cambium Learning, the parent company of Voyager, paid Oberndorf’s investment firm $4.9 million to buy back Oberndorf’s stock. Cambium currently offers a fleet of supplemental education tools for school districts. With the recent acquisition of Class.com, a smaller online learning business, the company announced its entry into the virtual charter school and online course market.
croweth me day
Tomorrow they may form and go.
You can't be forever blessed”
Metamorphosis (Atco/Atlantic)
”Oh thank you!” she took the card and tried opening it. He fingers slipped around the edges and the card dropped to the floor. He picked it up and opened it for her. He had stopped at a gas station to buy the card on his way over to the home. It was a generic Christmas card with a typical Christmas tree with packages underneath. Inside was the standard greeting and underneath he had scrawled out ‘Love, Brain-Emily-Samantha-Erica’. He had placed a picture of his family, taken from his wallet, inside the card. The picture was three years old. He handed it back to her and watched her study the picture.
It is illogical to talk of conversion to Sanatan Dharma. All are part of it and are effected by it. It is like saying that the laws of physics (e.g.gravity) will apply to you only if you belong to an organization or organized religion.
I can’t agree more that finding what you like and being able to do it as a job (such that, technically, you don’t even have to “work” for a day) makes you that most fortunate person in the world. It’s like finding your place on earth.
1. Act it out!! Set up a mud pile (we use a blanket), a big tub (we use our plastic bin), and let each child choose a favorite character to be. Sometimes we use our stuffed animal friends to fill in the extra parts, but even if you don’t, you can still have fun! Then, re-tell the story while acting out the parts! You could even supply fun props for each character, such as a scarf for Mrs. Wishy-Washy’s hair, a duck-bill for Duck, etc. Switch parts frequently and have fun!
Here is my miracle... a Delphinium is returning and the slugs haven't completely decimated it yet. There are two that I planted last summer but since I've never had luck with them returning or being completely chewed up by slugs I sort of thought of them as an annual. These are the one flower that I wish I could have a large stand of like I see in English cottage garden pictures. I have sprinkled a pet and wildlife safe slug bait around them and will be guarding them them for the rest of the spring. I will be keeping my fingers crossed that they will be blooming in June.
$1.00 off Pillsbury Refrigerated Holiday Cookie
"...Patrick came to Ireland as a boy, a slave, he returned with a forgiving heart, with the love of Christ—and God worked his miracle with this youth, for when he died many years later the voices of the children had been answered. They and their own children for generations, into the last edges of time, would know the gentle God who walked the shores of Galilee, would know that they too held a place in his heart. He sent them Patrick—God’s gift to the Irish and to all of us. In time Irish monks, inspired by the example of their patron saint would spread throughout Western Europe teaching the barbaric tribes who had invaded the old boundaries of the Roman Empire. They, like Patrick, would bring goodness and light, the civilizing force of their knowledge, into a world on the brink of darkness.
Stormy Skies is my favourite - well it was to begin with, then most of the others tied for 1st equal! A gorgeous greyed pastel blue with fine glitter that glows green most of the time. Every now and then I see the glitter shining yellow & blue too! I think there might be some fine shimmer in SS as well. This was a 2 coater also & it applied beautifully; but it dries a gritty so top coat is a must to get it to shine. I love staring at the photos of SS!!!!!
Perhaps your rubbish is a limiting belief (definitely top of the list to be sent to the tip!) Or your rubbish may be to change a behaviour or attitude. Removal of these things is a key to help you progress. Wouldn’t you rather move forward in your life instead of staying stuck with your decaying, fly infested pile of rubbish?
I've always loved Pamuk's novels (which I find serious and playful in exactly the right proportions), and consider him fundamental to my own education as a novelist. His work combines, in a very original way, the realist novelist's love of psychological exploration and a compelling "illusion of reality" with a postmodernist's skepticism, trickery, and self-consciousness about form. My Name Is Red and The Musem of Innocence are two of the greatest stories about love, desire, the body, and time that I've ever read. An old post from 2006 on Pamuk's novel My Name Is Red is here, and a long review of his book of essays Other Colours here.
Instead of trying to convince me how great it is to be a size ten when I have massive dark rings under my eyes and I'm stressed out of my mind, how about offering to help me out at dinner/bed time so I have a chance to eat when my children are going to bed? Or cooking me a healthy meal? Or just responding to me with "I'm sorry you're feeling crap" instead of "it's fantastic (that you feel like crap coz at least you're skinny)."
An issue that is so important and very real, and yet also very confusing and there’s lots of different opinions. These guys go back to the Bible and see what God actually has to say about how he promises to guide us. Short, easy to read and instantly helpful.
two packed bags
What should I do?
=$20.98
Fast and Loose: how often the term is now used by writers to warn the reader or viewer to be prepared for a healthy disregard for historical fact in the story they are about to read or witness.
(If I were to meet a man as whiny as this guy in real life, I might just give him a good kick to shut him up.)
There are many farms and nature reserves throughout the UK and each will allow visitors to get up close and personal with nature in a way that can be an enjoyable experience for children and adults alike.
I have signed up for A Human Service Work Diploma program at the local College in town. A 2 year Diploma, I'm currently studying for the tests I need to take to qualify to enter. This is the first step I've taken on my own to futher my education, and I'm very excited. It's not just something I saw that might be interesting, it's something I want, and without a doubt will obtain, come hell or high water.
from Magnolia Bakery
And I left the PICU and will never return.
Being my husband that I knew for many years now who loved to clean and fix things right away, I uttered, "Please...Don't tell me you're gonna' mop the floor now if there's a spot?" I jokingly teased. Silence. He kept surveilling the floor in front of him, like...right under me...
I could relate in some ways and other things I was literally screaming about. The things I was screaming about weren’t really so much about things she was doing but the way it ended.
Click on the links below to go to my accounts to download the PNG file, and leaves some love if you like my work :) Oh yeah, and I'm packaging up my freebees a bit more :) In case you didn't notice - ROFL!!!
When Maggie asked why they were training on the streets of a quiet residential area, a younger soldier responded, “To be honest ma’am, I don’t know.”
* "To the right, lawyers for the defendant stand proudly by their prize for preparing the best defence for their clients. To the left, lawyers for the claimant ... who clearly didn't go to Specsavers" (Dinusha Sirisena)
Morneau will have yet another stint on the DL after experiencing soreness in his right wrist. Morneau has become a frequent visitor on the DL; last season he posted career lows in all major offensive categories (disregarding his rookie year) while having several different stints on the DL for PCS, neck surgery, wrist issues, shoulder issues (over the course of a few years).
Urging the PM to advise the Yang di Pertuan Agong to form a tribunal immediately, Mat Zain said Najib should do it before he goes on his impending vacation, if he felt deceiving the agong and Conference of Rulers was a serious matter.
Rest quietly there, Oh comrades brave, sleep peacefully in the silent grave.
Moving on up the lottie, the next bed on the right is currently covered in very well rotted horse muck which I need to dig in ready for the brassicas. I was in such a dilemma regards how to prepare my brassica bed, every book and every website conflicts with one another, so I trusted the oldest book I had, so fingers crossed!
A player can purchase "eggs" for real money, but we aren't doing that. Instead, we use "breeding caves," choosing dragon types that seem likely to produce the hybrid we seek. The process often takes a day or two in real time. We are learning patience.
My classmates have expressed wonder at some of the British illusion because they were a little delusional, too, and I think this happens because you don’t belong to a place or have little knowledge of it. One of the girls asked why the British were there. Did India have anything to offer? Wasn’t it poor? Rape of the Land. So she asked why the Indians weren’t happy, because in return, the British were teaching them how to dress up and use their land and were giving them education. Well, Indians did not exactly roam around naked, they were fine farmers, and they did have their own system of education, just not Western. And they invented zero. She also asked why educated Indians were such sexual beasts. Well, isn’t everyone a little omnisexual?
Why not try making your own from metallic card with punches? ... or stamp onto shrink plastic/acetate and colour with permanent markers or glitter glues? Peel off stickers are perfect for 'faux charms' if placed onto metallic or glitter card and cut out. Then you just need to dangle them from pretty ribbon or wire and jobs'a'good'un.
My son had a play date today so I thought it would be a perfect time to make them. I love how quickly they came together and they were so delicious! You seriously can't eat just one! :)
The grilled tomato , on the other hand, was redundant since the texture was so tough and was not juicy at all.
Sound fun? It is. And my varsity team earned a medal at their first competition! I was so proud of them (and more than a little relieved that I hadn't been leading them astray because it turns out that cookies are very 2007 and for this year's competition cupcakes are the thing to bake).
For thee is one day as a thousand years,
When the previous great depression hit America, Hoover sat idly while millions suffered, waiting for “the market” to eventually sort things out. FDR actually did something — he created jobs through programs like the WPA and CCC. The suffering was ameliorated, while the workers’ paychecks helped spur more economic growth. And some very useful things got built, too — roads, bridges, national parks.
I haven't used my fountain pens a lot this summer. It's not that I was bored or anything-- I just started writing with gel pens more often. But I randomly resumed writing with fountain pens a few weeks ago. Cleaning out pens, refilling them, writing gibberish on any available paper...it's all a time to sit down, pause, and reflect.
Dress
At this point it’s almost impossible for me to share my feelings about the show. All I can bring myself to say is that it’s not perfect, but it’s still a pretty great television program that I intend to watch again next Sunday.
Remember the first disappointment, the first heartache and how deep it’s carved in your heart?
"Elsewhere more left-wing men of letters are breaking cover and saying openly what they have been muttering over the olive ciabatta in Hampstead and Islington. Martin Bright, who was an Orwell Prize judge this year, has come down hard tempered with mercy. In a tone which echoes Guido’s headmasters before a caning he writes:", as the blogger pulled out a piece of paper with a quote scribbled in barely legible handwriting, he read:
Seeing I live in the country surrounded by cows I thought I'd pick a topic close to my heart. So here are my farmyard finds, click on the pictures for more information on any product, and please support hand made where ever you can this Christmas.
San Antonio, TX
The moment - for me - is relaxation, reward, release, relief and refreshment. It's a moment to savour, a moment of mateship, potential, fulfilment, anticipation, satisfaction, and sheer bliss.
#2..New Neighbors..So-- there was this tiny house over and down the road a Tad. Super small-- I think when it was for sale the real estate had it listed as 565 Sq Foot. That house has new Tenants. 4 adults and 2 small children under 5--and no-- I have no idea how they all sleep in there.. I must say that they have done some improvements to the place. A really nice fence around the place, A New coat of paint, Planting of fruit trees, Removal of dead trees etc. But-- also came with it, Nightly Bonfires in a No Burn zone ( fire department has been called at least 4 times that we know of). Dogs that Bark every time a leaf moves , all night,, every night....and no one that will tell them to stop. Nightly Pot Parties around the "bonfire"....and Chickens....Which I think is great..Nothing like fresh eggs...But seriously The chicken Coop...well lets just say they have it strategically placed on the very edge of the property line under their neighbors windows.
Don’t make fun of the government transformation programme and ETP just because the figures used by Pemandu are intellectually dishonest.
Fire Mountain's Oregon Pale Ale was infected and was inexcusably served anyway. I dumped it.
Not too long ago, Mommy received an email invitation from Huggies Malaysia to attend an event called "Huggies Play Date" at Saujana Hotel, Subang. Mommy reckoned that Mommy was invited not because Huggies know whether Mommy is a mummy blogger or not, but rather because Mommy's name is in their mailing list since Mommy joined the Huggies Club long time ago to get some free diaper samples. ^_^
This Barrett media stand (while I didn't first picture it as that...) has great detail, a great color, and perfectly scaled. However, at $699, I'll keep my eye out at some of those thrift stores I've been missing out on while pregnant...
In a way, I am going to be sorry to see this glorious weather that we’ve had for the last week come to an end, but we need rain, badly.
that would mount up to the skies
1 threats
It's been a couple months since I've played in the Midnight Madness sketch challenge and I'm finally back at it again this week. I've loved Priscilla's sketches and it feels good to be playing in her team's challenge again.
Stiff-leaf capital. A late 12th and early 13th century capital found almost entirely in Britain with sculptured foliage, a development from the crockets of crocket capitals.
To cut out the white noise of haste, I screeched my deadline-driven week to a halt. Starting with a Zumba class (think Brazilian hip hop) on Friday evening, I literally danced my way into the weekend. On Saturday morning, I spent two hours on a manuscript, then attended my son’s soccer game only to then have lunch with the family and some quiet time on the couch reading with my husband. The workshop went from 4-10 p.m, whizzing by both days. I left the room a different person. A clearer one who lives in acceptance of what is at any given moment.
Suddenly, a shadow looms over my body.
Whatever it was...I'm still recovering. Thank you, antihistamine tablets and topical gels.
from everybody tellin’ me what I’m suppose to believe.
Fortunately, it wasn’t long after this that my son dropped his cell phone into the toilet.
To honour this great event, industrialist Mukesh Ambani threw a lavish party at his residence in Mumbai on 26th March. And trust us , one great bash it was. All the biggies from the world of politics , industry and cricket were there.
Okay... at 9:22 PM PST on Saturday, January 16, 2010... I invited you all to become authors (please check your email boxes and/or spam boxes).
Now it happened in the meantime that the sky became black with clouds and wind, and there was a heavy rain. So Ahab rode away and went to Jezreel. Then the hand of the Lord came upon Elijah; and he girded up his loins and ran ahead of Ahab to the entrance of Jezreel.
University of the Third Age (U3A) is
“You’re a better man than I am, Gunga Din”.
* Robert Munsch
As for me and my house, we are desperately wishing for white fluffy flakes falling softly, building the foundation needed for snowmen, snow forts, and snow balls. (These are staple materials for childhood in winter!)
In the series of posts that follow, I'm going to lay out 7 reasons I think these flaws - which are significant, no doubt - are completely worth overlooking. EDIT: All posts are now linked below.
And, from that bit of awkward flippancy, we started to play ketchup from the years and lifetimes since we'd spoken. She told me of having a four and a half year old daughter and was shocked to hear mine was nearly eighteen. Once upon a time, I was the rarity, being a parent. Nowadays, the shock comes in the reminding that my whelp is at least ten years older than oldest of many of my friend's offspring.
1 moose
Back to the topic at hand though. I was thinking this morning that the Percy Jackson "Empire" has been nothing BUT a learning experience for our family. We went to see it the first time with much excitement. It looked really good, and it was. Marti and Lilly both loved it, especially Lilly. A few weeks later my grandma gave me some money for cleaning her house. After refusing the money she told me "oh, just take the kids to a movie or something" so we took them to see Percy Jackson again.
So we are looking at moving. Based on the dire housing market, the only sure fire way of doing this involves selling our souls to the Devil (well, our house to a builder). That means moving in to a shiny new house built from cardboard and spit. It also means being able to move, and possibly sit in a room without rearranging the furniture or turfing children from the near vicinity.
P.S. Has this ever happened to anyone else before??? So weird!
In an interview, Archbishop Weakland said that he recalled a final meeting at the Vatican in May 1998 in which he failed to persuade Cardinal Bertone and other doctrinal officials to grant a canonical trial to defrock Father Murphy. (In 2002, Archbishop Weakland resigned after it became public that he had an affair with a man and used church money to pay him a settlement.)
3. If time is relative to each species, is it ‘absorbed’ through the brain? Or… do we emit time or interact with it in some way?????
throughout this mighty land
Ask yourself: what moral imperative informs the attitudes of these church leaders toward Israel? What is it that drives them to help obliterate the very root from which their churches spring? What in God’s name permits them to close their ears to the wishes of those in the pews, who disagree almost totally with their secularized, pomo vision. Where is the ecclesia in this witches’ brew of hatred, intolerant tolerance, and politically correct insanity? It is behavior which provokes one to ponder the reality of a personification of Evil out there somewhere, pulling the strings of a group of addled do-badders.
Zahir wasn't the first to mix "classical" instruments like oud or qanun with street music. The celebrated Houcine Slaoui (the father of Moroccan chaabi music, IMHO) was doing this in the 1940's. However, Hamid Zahir's recordings kick out the jams a bit more - perhaps because Slaoui was recording on 78rpm discs, while Zahir, who rose to fame in the 1960s, made recordings on 45s and LPs.
I, Kevin Wild, will be featuring items that appear on the IBB Design showroom floor.
What books to donate?
Nicole: You don’t have to have a degree in English, although I’m sure that would help. My degree is completely unrelated to my writing and editing careers. Basically, any writer can become an editor. Start out small and help other writers by being a beta reader and critique partner. Learn or relearn all of the grammar rules. Take a course, if you need too. Then you can start to apply for editing positions at smaller publishers and work your way up.
As you can tell, most of my goals are oriented around the numbers 5 and 25. I thought it would make it funny and more fun this year.
“Only if we fail. But we never fail,” said David. “Miss, please stay here.” David walked with Chris to the door and waited for one of the men in black to signal. One turned and nodded. Now whispering, David said, “Just walk at a normal pace out to the middle of the street and stop there. Please resist the urge to run. You won’t see us coming, but you’ll see us when we arrive. Even if they touch you or grab you, don’t worry. They’re easily subdued. They don’t mean any harm. They just don’t know what else to do. If anything, have pity on them. They were lied to, and that’s why they’re here.”
Because the thought of doing this forever ... well, it just isn't worth thinking about. I mean, honestly. What would life be like without alcohol, sugar or caffeine? No chocolate. No red wine. No coffee.
So the question is if you have a bit of money at this moment; but, you know that you will not have this money in the future, which tools would you purchase to improve your self sufficiency?
Utkala-fr-utkala-maha prabhu
But before he is accorded the same Mahatma status as Gandhi, who peacefully reclaimed India from the British and a man whom Mandela says was his guiding light and inspiration, it's important to examine his record as a freedom fighter. What it shows is that like so many black Africans fighting the evil of apartheid or colonialism, he has a record of advocating and condoning violence.
“N Day,” Philip Latham, 1946 – A timid astronomer discovers that the sun will go nova soon. Suddenly, nothing matters, and he’s able to stand up to the university president. He gives an interview to the papers, but everyone is “too conceited” to believe that the world that was created for them will come to an end. Eventually he dies, laughing out of control, alone.
Moving in instantly, Jung-Ah learns that Jae-Hyuk met Cinderella. Chain reaction: Jung-Ah calls her mom, her mom calls Jae-Hyuk’s mom. Too bad, she is already annoyed by Madam Jo and cuts her phone call off.
These Glass Snack Cubes are a great little size for storing, freezing, and even serving snacks too. Use for snacks, small amounts of leftovers and even homemade baby food. There are also a few different sizes available from MightyNest for your specific needs including the smaller square cubes, bowls, and sandwich cubes.
Each wallpaper pack contains 15 wallpapers at 640 x 960 so they will work on the iPhone 4S, 4, 3GS, 3G and 2G. You can download all three of my Wallpaper Packs below.
I gotta go to the gym to get my mind off this perplexing situation.
my story -
every gear
I created: Long and lean and really mean.
Log house kits are the perfect way to build your dream vacation home. Log home manufacturers offer a wide array of packages and options.
Elizabeth Margaret or Em as she prefers to be called was pretty bland. She complained about how controlling her parents were but she didn't seem willing to give up her cushy life to pursue something else; the idea never even occurred to her until she visits her aunt. I did like her sister but since sis stays home, there wasn't very much of her. The other characters are cartoonish caricatures in the case of the grandmother and parents, so much so that they didn't seem like real people or just on the quirky side in the case of Em's aunt Tilly. There is also a romantic interest who was not to my taste. None of them received sufficient development in my opinion; I can't care about a character who is just flat.
Pour the egg mixture into the dry ingredients. Add the chocolate chips and mix together, avoiding over-mixing. (I found the mixture very dry and stiff so I added a splash of milk here to loosen it.)
The idea was simple: each act would do a couple of their own songs in the first half before returning to perform Dury's songs with The Blockheads in the second. The proceeds from the show would go to Cancer BACUP. The ticket shows some sort of sponsorship from Dr Martens, which seems appropriate.
I wonder if AA takes reservations?
If you have any questions, feel free to email me at shadyglade(AT)mail(DOT)com.
Anxiety, my old friend. All the things I have no control over, those are the things that worry me most. The more unproductive the worry, the stronger it wraps around my belly, my throat, my head.
Then, you won’t let me keep the UN-used q-tips out of my bathroom sink (that has no drain cover) as I attempt to clean the new piercings I’d gotten last night. Instead, I had to throw a good sized amount away. And in effect, money went right in to my trash can.
KORPIKLAANI 38 Hajó, Folk 'n' Troll Fesztivál Budapest, Hungary (22-10-2007)
Please add any events or activities you think should be promoted or which you would like to promote yourself in the comments, and let me know if you have any events in the coming weekends you would like to promote.
Isaiah 65: 1-2
V-E Day (the end of the war in Europe) had occurred in May and everyone was hoping and praying for the end of the war in Japan. I remember seeing pictures in magazines of how things would be once the war was over. I was particularly impressed with a picture of a candy store display that actually had chocolate bars along with the Chuckles gum drops, taffy and hard candy we were used to seeing throughout the war.
the country has cracked down on people using marriage as a means of gaining access to Denmark.
Be sure to pop over to Get Picky and check out the girls stunning layouts and of course our beautiful guest Iris Baboa Uy's layout....I know you won't be able to resist the temptation to play along and be in the running for an awesome Dusty Attic prize pack.
-- This may sound rather silly to most of you but while you're in Italy, eat Italian. Please do not be one of those American tourists who seeks out the Hard Rock Cafe for a burger and greasy fries. I enjoyed some of the most delicious courses of my life while in Rome and can't wait to go back.
2/3 cup dried cranberries
One time I was talking with my brother GC and I mentioned the TV show to him, another time my former classmate DH came over & I talked with him & I told him about the TV show, and there were a few other things that happened that I can not remember.
Level 5: Recovers 50 HP and 15 MP every 4 seconds.
It’s on you, Brandon. You go, Boy(kin)!
Sets and Costumes: Great New York exteriors and the ultimate in smart little suits. Best of all, the Mondrian-esque office interiors, which Negulesco, a painter, probably influenced.
Juan Gonzalez (Rangers) vs. Cal Ripken (Orioles)
Soooo, after all this burst of musical instruments creationism people suddenly started to turn their backs on the gregorian version of Wham! and reoriented themselves to a more happy and shinier style of music:
“Hang on,” he shouted to Finn. “Giddyup, Maud.” He had Maud running as hard as she could right at the gate. Finn didn’t have time to think of what could happen. If Maud stumbled they would be thrown off her back, maybe have her land on top of them or, even worse, they might be tossed right to the feet of Billy Reed’s bull.
“Since its launch Plain Packs Protect has been actively promoting plain packaging online and through billboard advertisements that have sprung up all over the south west of England. We wondered how they could afford to pay for them. Now we know.
the one
She's ably and energetically supported by Josh Abrahams (bass), Frank Rosaly (drums) and guitarist Jeff Parker (of Tortoise). Guitarist Parker has the most original tone of the four, simultaneously edgy and slippery, like a punk Bill Frisell.
My point is that we’ve known for at least 25 years that we had a problem. It’s not exactly true that we’ve done nothing. We’ve invented Individual Retirement Accounts (IRAs) and 401k plans. But at the same time, we’ve left the charade that is Social Security go unreformed.
Freeman's Journal - Tuesday 20 December 1898, page 3.
My sister, Suzette, put this together...the ornaments were a nice finishing touch! If any of you guys remember last year's tea, you'll see we added some red to the decorating scheme this go round...I love RED!
17.Slim Ducket And Pig Norwood / I Want To Go Where Jesus Is
Mabel blamed her father for her mother’s death. She told him she would never forgive him. Rebecca was too young to understand what had happened. She missed her mom and cried frequently. It was her dad who she trusted to take care of her. Miguel felt guilty and ashamed. His only way in dealing with the pain was to drink more. Though he didn’t come home yelling at his family as he did before, he would often cry in front of them as he listened to music that he and his wife had listened to before, particularly songs from Cornelio Reyna.
I will give your more details as soon as I hear from you, including the sharing ratio.
In addition, Liberty Mutual will “insist on receiving sufficient prices to cover the risk or we will not write it.”
Big Oil is enjoying record profits thanks to the rise in prices due to increasing global demand for oil. So, naturally, the Environmental Protection Agency just denied Shell Oil’s bid to drill for oil offshore of Alaska. Some environmental group has requested that some useless lizard no one has ever heard of be declared an endangered species in order to shut down oil drilling in a large swath of the West.
“The Club held a number of meetings and conversations with the football authorities, police and administrators prior to the match and everyone agreed that the priority on Saturday was to ensure there was no disorder around the match due to the highly charged atmosphere that was anticipated.
October 30 Philadelphia, PA Electric Factory
Here is the card that I made for the Hambo Hoedown Challenge this week! I used the free CANDY HEART digi that was offered for participating in last weeks challenge. How cool is it that they give you a free digi every week just for playing along??!!
upcoming UEFA Champions
2. Finely diced onion, saute until brown and tender
Saving Private Ryan (dir. Steven Spielberg, 1998)
Jay-walking is a sin
'You have heard!' exclaimed my neighbour, with some astonishment. 'Am I, then, to understalnd that my young friend has allowed so many weeks to elapse without examining this last achievement of engineering skill?'
Thank you to everyone who entered! If you didn't win and still want something from Finditgames.com click HERE to order. Use code FIGBLOG to get $5 off your order good till July 31,2010 so hurry!!!
inspiration.. all in all, my company all day.
“I look forward to continuing to fight the fight,” Pendleton said. “We can make this happen in Kentucky.”
The peaceful ride downtown was gone. Then they sang the Tequila Song. I still had no idea what had caused this invasion, nor did most of our other fellow travelers judging from the looks on their faces, until that same girl started screaming, "LOVEFEST! LOVEFEST! GONNA GET ME SOME LOVE AT LOVEFEST! LOVE LOVE LOVE! WOOOOOO HOOOOOOOO!"
Frid was not your typical leading man. He had a quirky nature that suited the character of a 175 year old vampire set loose in a world he didn't understand. He admitedly had a hard time learning lines, since the five day a week schedule was grueling, and the show was practically live, as it was then costly to reshoot scenes, but the hesitancy of Frid the actor sometimes worked for the character of Barnabas, who was supposed to be trying to hide his true existence from the world around him. Barnabas was given to soliliques and introspection, not unlike a number of Marvel heroes. He was a decidedly sympathetic character and was wildly popular for the shows five year period.
Also, see that rugby stripe painted rock on the shelf?
I finally got down to sorting out my Korea haul! Which is when I realised that compared to last year’s epic haul, I’ve actually been rather a very good girl this year! I was much more targeted and specific in what I wanted, but on the downside, I did want some pretty high-end brands which kinda evened out the score. Some of these are for friends/family so it’s not all for me!
We later ventured to one of our favorite places, only to be saddened that, alas, there was no Mini Harajuku summer clothes to be found. (the clothing line, I've been semi-obsessed with, that Gwen Stefani designed for Target!) I wish Target would have their lil baby stuff all the time. But no, it was just moderately cute stuff, that had scratchy trim- we no likey scratchy stuff. pleh...nothing worthy of buying...and we need some warm weather clothes for lil' Ellie.
The train scenes take place on carefully restored cars from the Orient Express. I found the fight scene on the train to be well-choreographed and skillfully filmed in very confining spaces—in the actual train.
Same old story
it looks amazing!
And let’s not forget the music portion of this weekend. DJ Drez will be there and so will Suzanne Sterling, Adam Stern, and MC Yogi.
Walt – Thanks Bob. Call me, Walt Arnold at 256-1255, become a fan on Facebook, follow me on Twitter or visit my website waltarnold.com for current listings in the Abq area. Sperry Van Ness is a full service commercial real estate company helping Landlords and Tenants solve space and lease requirements, investors maximize their cash flow and rates of returns through investment in commercial properties and through our professional property management we help owners maximize cash flows and preserve assets. Hey Bob, happy first Monday of daylight savings time. I’ll talk to you next week.
The problem with fairy tales is that they set a girl up for disappointment. In real life, the Prince goes off with the evil stepsister. The Princess kisses a frog and it remains, well ... a frog. Or the spell wears off and two lovers realize they're better off as friends.
They were a lovely young couple and I have to admit to having a few little tears as it was all so special!
She deals with her new child with calm and a gentleness that is so sweet.
Gilly's card this week is very cute, a baby card with an 'all in one' baby suit, cleverly paper pieced and hung on a little washing line. The colours are gorgeous Gilly and I do so love that little suit! I spend a lot of time here with my nose pressed against the screen peering at all your photos girls and even the little elephant seems to be paper pieced, and holding a little glossy heart in his trunk - aaaah, lovely Gilly!
1. Whenever I’m feeling all emo about lost love and if I’ll ever find it again, I’ll pin the shit out of my “Writer Inspiration” board instead of talking about it
Instead, however, that line is used just as it was the first time, as the first line of what is now the second verse, and a very unique liaison linking the two verses together is accomplished.
without any sight
I love Paris in the summer when it sizzles.
Donald L. Adams, 28, Chatham, N.J.
Yesterday I took a detour. In order to avoid waiting 22 minutes for the 44 bus, I took a walk that brought me back to age 25.
Lo and behold, I was dilated to 2 cm! With Renae and Sammy, I never dilated until labor began so this was pretty encouraging. With that in mind, and the fact that this was my 3rd baby and my chance of having a normal vaginal birth was high, I decided to go with an induction the next day.
I need to complete the border with it.
The library is my friend. I rarely (for me) go to the library with a specific title or author in mind. Instead, I like to wander and randomly pull out books, read the cover, leaf through them, and decide if it looks interesting.
I don't suppose anyone listens to the ramblings of Lord Astor, but Labour should beware of talking up the BNP in Nottingham. These stupid tactics may be its only hope of making an advance in the city.
Blurb: I have two weeks. You’ll shoot me at the end no matter what I do.
Glenn Richter arrived at a West Side synagogue on Monday to collect surplus bagels — fresh nutritious bagels — to donate to the poor. However, under a new edict from Bloomberg’s food police he can no longer donate the food to city homeless shelters.
Don't be discouraged! We'll get through this together and be better readers for it.
Seats made from "fine, hand-sewn upholstery by a motorcycle saddle maker" were then added to the spaces chopped into the log, creating a surreally massive piece of high-end furniture.
The words of this song speak directly to my heart as I consider all that my Savior has done for me - and all that he has done for you. I pray that they speak to you as well.
We think too much and feel too little:
As Jay Carney, the White House press secretary, put it, Common was invited to the event “partly because of his efforts to bring poetry to audiences that don’t get to experience it. And we think that’s a positive thing.” This is a problematic justification for a couple of reasons.
I support the cup campaign atleast 2 times a week. Everytime I walk into a 7-Eleven, I have to search deep to find an Obama cup. I think I have a taste for some hot chocolate....I know just where I would like to go.
In his divine homestead,
I watched The War on Kids last night, screened as part of this month's Festival of Anarchy. It's a GREAT film, though very depressing. I cried at multiple points during it, and I just kept thinking "thank you mom, for never sending me to school!". To allow things to continue the way they are, to keep quiet when so many are suffering--depressed, self-harming, suicidal--in school doesn't feel right to me.
I’ll be making another batch of CJ’s House of the Rising Sun JPA. I’m going to use some of the yeast that I harvested from the first batch, so I think I’ll go ahead and make a starter tonight. I have some dry yeast if it doesn’t work. I’ll crush the steeping grains Friday evening as well as measuring out the hop additions and getting the brewery ready.
He said: ‘The ministerial code says there has to be a clear divide between genuine government matters and overtly party political matters such as talking about donations. This is a clear breach of the rules. I would have thought that the Conservative Party had enough office space of its own without the chairman setting himself up in 10 Downing Street.’
“Donna!” he yelled. “Donna where are you?”
I try really hard to make everybody happy, but that's impossible, and as a result, I'm giving myself an ulcer and developing an aversion to blogging. Because inevitably a blog will lead to comments about how I'm making someone very unhappy in some way. And I don't want to make anyone unhappy. I want to make you all happy, and not just because of what you've done for me, but because I like to make people happy.
CORSICANA, Texas — Three men have been charged with murder after authorities said a 24-year-old was dragged to his death by a strap attached from his neck to a pickup truck bumper.
And it’s going to take all of you, our nation’s chefs. That’s why I am so moved to see you all here. You all are at the heart of this initiative, because if anyone understands nutrition and food, it’s the folks sitting here in their whites today. I know what they’re called -- “whites.” (Laughter.) We tease Sam. We call them “blouses” just to make him mad. (Laughter.)
Moyo said he had given the policeman all the information, but that not all of it was in the written statement.
In the column, Bradford details spill out, but with 21 verified FOI responses now in, the city remains firmly lodged at the top of our "greed index". The point is made. Now at last, says Booker, we may begin to understand how these "lords of the town halls" can afford to award themselves salaries which make them some of the highest paid people in Britain today.
through your heads now: codes do not apply to the People, only to the
These are just a few links that stood out for me this week.
We stood behind a nice little polygamous family with 12 kids.
By performing soft tissue therapy, you are simultaneously decreasing the density of your tissues. As a result of this phenonmenon, your muscles become more responsive to stretching/mobility drills, which in turn allows the antagonist muscle to efficiently fire. Have you ever tried to stretch a band, which is bound by a knot? If so, you may recall that as you stretched the band, the knot appeared to grow tighter. Therefore, instead of a band, imagine your muscles being bound with the previously mentioned knot and your choice to stretch prior to foam rolling. Simply put, if you are hoping to improve the health of your tissues, be sure to roll before stretching/mobilizing.
Guinsoo: Yeah, and he wiretaps our phones.
I finally settled for a coffee ice cream "something-or-other" with dark chocolate chips - no stick.
My official apologies for sucking hard at Responding to Comment Protocol. I will try harder, but only when it's easy, which means I'm going to go climb in a lukewarm bath and think about Swedish baby names.
“We hypothesized that religion would change how compassion impacts generous behavior,” said study lead author Laura Saslow, who conducted the research as a doctoral student at UC Berkeley.
“Yeah. My name. The fuck you care about it?”
Raising a daughter sure isn't an exact science and it's not like shooting trap or skeet where if you miss a few things, you can just shoot another round. Time with my daughter seems to be running out far too quickly these days. She is sixteen and now has her driver's and motorcycle license so she really doesn't need mom or dad to chauffeur her around much any more.
I havent posted in a couple of days because, as the title suggests, things proceeded on down a steep downward slope after my last post (Mid “Episode” Post). So much has happened since I last posted (and I am still exhausted), so I am kind of at a loss as to how I should approach this post. Im beginning to feel very panicky just sitting here thinking about it. Ok, we last left off, my sister had left, I was extremely pissed off at her (stupid fucking fears of abandonment), and all I wanted was for her to come back here and “fix it”, I was also feeling very suicidal (maybe Im going to have to make this a multiple part post, this is entirely way to overwhelming).
“You’ll have to go to the Dark Cemetery to get it,” said Riva, “preferably at midnight. “ She chuckled at Marlene’s stricken expression.
Divide this mixture between three bowls (or as many colours as desired), add the food colouring and stir well.
Mile 7 - 10:07
In fact, when the story first broke, I wondered on Twitter why everybody was making such a big deal about it (other than for the typical, shameless, sensationalist reasons, of course). Petrino isn’t the first big time coach to be caught where he shouldn’t have been and he won’t be the last by a long a shot. Even when Petrino’s passenger was identified as an Arkansas athletics department staffer, I wondered what the big deal was.
I was complaining about how much pollen was in the house with only 1 window open. Sean then explained to me that a walking key opened all the windows the night before.
What’s unfortunate is that even with my impatience, the decorations sat in our garage untouched for about a week until I got off of my lazy butt and started unpacking everything.
Well, nobody listened.
Now, just in case you'd like to give this a go, here's a mini tutorial:
On another note, here is my latest and greatest.
Adnan’s cousin also had built one of Jeddah’s finest historical museums which unfortunately was lost in a fire several years ago. I have seen many photos of this museum and it was splendid. The museum had a collection of some 10,000 artifacts which reflected the history and progress of Jeddah’s civilization. The tragedy of the museum fire was an immeasurable and tremendous loss for the city of Jeddah.
A woman carrying her son's pet mouse, Nibbles, in her blouse. She walked across the road to Rowles' home to see his wife when he noticed the mouse.
Scoop the dough into mounds, arranging them 3 inches apart on the prepared baking sheets.
Tsunami Bomb
So I found a photo of a fingerprint, I believe one of the ones from the Tate murder site (Patricia Krenwinkel?), and enlarged it and reinforced/redrew it with ink to make it more graphically appealing (I doubt it would pass muster in court today). I drew the lettering on a separate acetate in a very New Wave splattery style which would be printed in red over the black and white fingerprint... you know, like words written in blood, wheee!
I didn't really take a lot of pictures this weekend, mainly because my phone takes great pictures, but it's also slow, and that's frustrating. I think I'm gonna bite the bullet and buy a camera. Every girl needs to document her life.
Something grabs hold and clutches so tight,
I don’t have a lot of interaction with the support staff (mostly because I still can’t figure out what it is that they DO, exactly), and of the three other lawyuhs, there’s only one I regularly talk to. And even him I can go for days without seeing. Other than T-Bone, I’ve gotten four phone calls in the almost three months I’ve been there. And other than administrative BS and birthday/retirement/quinceanera/food-related announcements, I’ve gotten two substantive emails. TWO. And they were both replies to actual work-related issues I brought up. It's so bizarre. It’s like my office is some kind of timewarp/vacuum/CrissAngelMindFreak zone.
The movie spends a lot of time laying out the groundwork for the games, but once we get into the actual killing competition, the second half and ending seem rushed.
Amanda up front at the hair show being very excited after she mastered the technique the instructor showed her.
Again, my condolences go out to everyone involved with trying to make this flick look like anything more than a rose-colored deception with occasional blossoming explosions slapped on the screen. Everyone, that is, except the master of this whole disaster. And for Irwin Allen's involvement, we must shake our heads and think back to happier times: like when getting stung to death by killer bees was a viable option.
Since the military council, known as Scaf, took power in February, the Copts’ situation has worsened. Attacks on churches and congregations in Cairo and Upper Egypt were followed by the killing of 27 protesters, mostly Christian, by security forces at Maspero, Cairo in October. Like many Copts, Samia now believes the army has a clandestine power-sharing deal with the Muslim Brotherhood—and is willing to sacrifice the rights of minorities to secure it.
I have always loved Georgia O’Keefe’s work – it’s so fluid and organic, and her use of colours is stunning. And on the literary side, Bill Bryson’s drollness and sense of childlike wonder and curiosity always reminds me to look at the world with fresh eyes, and not assume that I know what’s going on.
Our final walk through is Monday April 30th! YAY!! We went out a few days ago and we were completely shocked at everything that had been done. Our carpets in, our kitchen floor had been fixed and changed to the wood, ours lights were all in and working, our toilets in and working, the exteriors were almost done…etc.
“Hold onto it Grace, you can give it back when I see you again.”
Nepali ngos working on trafficking issues
know about Tosca's book.
F ierce winds are bound to blow
The scientists who are studying the brains of these extraordinary people are learning new things all the time. It was great to see a Cambridge neuroscientist see MRI images he did not think were possible, when the visual area of a blind man’s brain ‘lit up’ as they played him various sounds. The plasticity of the brain has been talked about, by neuroscientists anyway, for some time, but here we could see this phenomenon demonstrated in all its glory.
Jack Sh*tter,
I have been avoiding discussing this subject for a long time. It makes me sad and sick. I don't have enough words to express my disgust for what has happened. I don't doubt that we will be dealing with it for decades to come.
i am, however, making one lil change to my blocks. i am so not a big quilt person so i am miniaturizing them! i convinced my mom to do and she made her january blocks on the 4th or something crazy early like that. i think she might have her february blocks done already (she'll probably comment and tell us :D).
Maybe I'll ride through the park
You cannot mourn every loss in this world. Mourn your own losses, allow the people around you to mourn theirs, and never, ever tell another person that their loss is less important than yours.
Pierre Herme and Laduree have a recipe for their passion fruit and raspberry tart. Pierre's version has a layer of thin genoise and raspberry jam in the bottom, while laduree does not. Instead, Laduree's version has fresh raspberries on top of the tart, which one of my favorite blogger, Evan, tried in her blog and she made it as beautiful as the book does. The recipe for the passion fruit cream is similar, both has huge amount of butter that you blend at the end. It is not really surprising since Pierre used to work at Laduree before opening his own shop, so you would find similar desserts between the two. I decided to go with Pierre's version by adding thin genoise and raspberry jam layer in the middle. I didn't use his genoise recipe though, I used some joconde I had available at that time and I made simple raspberry jelly.
1: Recall
Confessions of a College Chick is all about real college experiences of students (freshmen, sophomore, juniors, seniors, and who ever else want to share their stories).
In an earlier post, Mr Goh remarked in a sarcastic manner that Nicole was too ‘immature’ for politics and ‘advised’ her to ‘control’ herself and learn some ‘self-discipline’:
**Stop bothering me then! I've always fulfilled your tasks, haven't I?**
I’ve read several reviews of this book and it seems that many people felt unsatisfied because they weren’t sure how they were supposed to feel, or what lessons they were supposed to take from the story. For me, that was the power of this book. I believe that everyone who reads it will take something different from it.
Geographically and culturally isolated, Iceland has produced relatively few internationally famous individuals in its thousand-year history. While scholars may remember some of the country's historical heros, name-dropping a character or two from its legendary Sagas, most people would probarbly struggle to pluck more than Magnus "I've started so I'll finish" Magnusson's name from the geothermally-heated ether.
Then you have to knock them down. You’ve got to jump up and down on them and then tie them to a set of railroad tracks while you get the locomotive warmed up.
2) Make sure you book a place to stay where you get served a big breakfast, not only could it be the only decent meal you get in the day but, you need the energy to keep you going through the workshops without your stomach rumbling.
For God shall be thy glory,
I've basically been doing a thrifty and handmade Christmas for years, but it seems there are more of us this year. I must say, it will be nice not to be the *odd* one anymore.
I live in a very nice part of town with huge parks stretching for miles just steps away from my door.
I normally don't like Miley Cyrus's songs, but this is one that I actually do like. This song is always such a good reminder to enjoy where I am at because there is always going to be some obstacle in my way, no matter what stage of life I am in.
Other: Copic Marker R29
The first thing I saw when I stepped out of my car at Claypits Lane Sports Ground was Paul Dyke, walking in the centre-circle of the pitch alongside who I guessed was the referee. Once they'd finished talking Dyke walked towards the car-park and sliced his palm in front of his throat. The game was off. The referee said there was too much surface water on the pitch. I joined the rest of our squad who were stood outside the clubhouse looking out toward the pitch longingly like fisherman looking out to sea.
We, even we, henceforth flaunt out masterful, high up above,
We should compete with ourselves, and no one else.
Welcome home Prada!
Opening Day at Target Field, plus some playoff tickets. Let’s also not forget that I’d be attending my first All-Star Game and World Series regardless of the Minnesota Twins involvement. I’d be making sure my Pappy was included on much of this. Also another pilgrimage to Cooperstown, New York for the Hall of Fame ceremony where Bert Blyleven should FINALLY be getting inducted.
Now it has been brought inside my house and I am loving it
“Shawn”!
The stone is given so you can save the saint (?). Anyway, when you have the stone, you will see the bar at the top right and you’ll need to hunt in specific areas to fill it up.
Pick a movement and without stopping (obviously unbroken)…100 Perfect Reps. We did this last year at about this same time, who knew that keeping a workout journal would come in handy?
At the mall,
Then again the heat from my keyboard'd probably melt my hands.
Clive: ‘I can’t say for sure that this is definite yet… but plans are being made, and April next year is being left open for a while. I really hope it does happen, because I’d love to get back to South America soon!’
You see, you don't have to have incredible wealth or ability or even a perfect heart to rescue one of these children. You don't have to have resources untold or even piles of compassion...you just need a heart to save
Those are wishful thinking conclusions. They do not fit the facts. That the truth (as I have presented it) is so incredibly difficult to wrestle with and so undesirable should be an indication that it is not what I want at all and therefore is not a product of wishful thinking. It is the sum total of what I have witnessed, experienced, and inferred from reading the historical record.
Let no one be fooled that this mantle can simply be picked up by any of the myriad of opposition forces. The death of non-racism in the ANC means the withering away of this dream for the country as a whole."
So what did the guys who summoned OBL from the Hades again had him say to convince us this time?
So far, my Thanksgiving day cooking consist of:
The day was fantastic---well there was one hiccup but really didn't take much gloss off the day.
(22) John Bernard Fitzpatrick, Coadjutor of Boston
“This is a little different from the WZ-10,” Wei commented to the pilot.
Arlan and I last spoke to each other in May. He ignored all my calls and messages and vanished out of my life. My friendship with Vackie is also splintering. We no longer see each other often, no longer talk to each other every day like we used to.
Then one day I went into a pub and found a group gathered round a TV set cheering wildly. Someone had scored a goal against England. The affectionate anti-Englishness of the general public is far more proof of the independent vitality of the Scottish nation than any vote. There is more racial abuse towards us in the English papers than we would ever think of using towards England. It is a much loved foreign country but it is recognised as foreign.
Would I like it now? Probably, not. But, the point to all us in the darkroom watching him–that a photograph was made in that darkroom as much as it was when we clicked the camera shutter.
A fantasy and an allegory, to be sure, but that's what Capra was best at. The film ripples with the masculine, hardball atmosphere of the Senate. Control of the media equals control of the message, and thus public opinion, and thus and finally, the work of government itself. Also worth seeing, but mostly as a curiosity, is Tom Laughlin's remake, Billy Jack Goes to Washington. Capra's film is, per the blog post title, simply riveting, whereas Laughlin's is rather limpidly-paced; Laughlin's Billy Jack is hardly the guiltless, guileless innocent that makes Capra's allegory work so well; Laughlin also unwisely injects a lot of real-world politics (and, as he does in seemingly every film, the ghastly spectre of sexual violence) into a story that's frankly not built to support them.
Forbes
it was a long day to say the least.
Hello and happy Friday abode lovers! I am SO excited for the weekend! I am going to Atlanta with childhood friends to see a new, sweet baby boy that has joined our quickly growing group! We will be swapping gifts and I can't wait to share about that Monday! Anyway, until then, I thought I would share with you my latest and greatest pins from the most spectacular thing since sliced bread, (or as one of my best friends says, 'the best thing since the internet!') Pinterest. If you haven't drunk the Pinterest kool-aid you have no idea what you're missing...
But, “we don’t necessarily want to make the exact same structure that an abalone does.”
It was also surprising to me the range of opinions that were represented. I certainly did not agree with all of them, but I recognize that everyone has a right to their opinion, and a right to be heard. It is my hope and prayer that, in the end, right decisions will be made for our country. It was fun to be a part of the process. Why did I wait so many years to get involved?
Heathrow – LA
To replenish the purse, there are various ways, the most popular of them – translated from another partypoker rakeback, the exchange of cash or other electronic money in exchange (the list is the Webmoney site), bank transfer, acquisition of special WMZ-cards. Strictly for the remittance of money to enter the commission does not take, but all types of transfers is usually meant for a small additional cost, usually 1-5%. To withdraw money available the same ways, except cards, the commission system is 0,8%, plus possible commission brokers.
That was the first pit of the last 20 minutes, that full-body rejection of the sight of an unbreathing baby. (Qualifier: I am a mom with a still-young baby and some unresolved junk around his birth - I know I have no business bringing all of that to anyone's birth, and I am not attending births. But I'm allowed to watch youtube.)
Nevermind that the phrasing of those statistics imply that more than 100% of Americans believed in Satanic Cults during the 1980s. If the director didn't care, we probably shouldn't either.
DJ Junior (John Santoro’s 6 years old son)
Stirring as we pray and seek
Nothing I do or say
background designs and fun technique stamps such as our
The type of history I refer to is seldom found in textbooks, and yet it is very much part of the Canadian experience. I call it "pioneer social history" because it deals with the lives and times of ordinary citizens. However, since these stories usually went to the grave with them it is necessary to reconstruct their lives from journals and fist-hand accounts.
The range of pens include the everyday 100 series to the more elite 700 series, with product features and pricing advancing as the design increases.
A few weeks ago, I found some of that orange plastic grid stuff that construction workers use. This small piece is the first time I tried it out. I need to work with it some more, but I see lots of potential. On this piece, I laid it on top of a canvas prepared with extra heavy gesso and smeared (okay, I'm having an elder moment here, can't remember the real name of the medium) a product that is supposed to dry to the texture of watercolor paper. The different texture didn't make much difference in the finished product, but it was an interesting experiment anyway.
P.S. Ryan Gosling can sing to me any morning, afternoon or night. Swooooooon! Check out ALL of his band’s stuff: Dead Man’s Bones
It's true that I've printed out pages upon pages of notes to leave to the grandparents, not so much of instructions, but intuition that I have had since the day my baby girl was placed in my arms, things I know because I spend every waking moment with her. It may also be that those intuitions, when translated onto paper, prove that I am in fact slightly psychotic.
So now you know why I said I had a rollercoaster week: First the news of the operation and some other things – then the news that I am the face of USN Phedra Cut Lipo XT.
Garnishing your will with a wild and springing gait
Very often I am downgrading you..seeing you only with an eye..like you are nobody..
-1-subject notebook
Sunday- Leftovers (don't remember what they were exactly....)
· Nightclub event at LAVO, located inside The Palazzo – all registrants receive complimentary entrance before midnight.
Besides creating a strong textural element the horizontal express joins seen in the veneer cladding and horizontal bars in the feature lights (often seen in Japanese furniture) represent man’s relation to the earth.
Many years ago I worked for an organization where the regional manager was extremely inconsistent in his moods and how he treated his managers (big Jerk). The result? More Time trash. No one knew what to expect so they tried to look busy whenever he was around, never asked questions (out of fear of being ridiculed), and never challenged him even when they knew the direction he was steering them in was wrong. Time Management at its worst. Not only is it a bad way to spend your time but it is demeaning.
Born on the Caribbean island of St. Kitts but moving to Birmingham, England when she was eight, award-winning singer-songwriter Joan Armatrading started writing songs when she was fourteen years old. She says "I've always thought of myself as a songwriter first. I write all the time. The last thing I think about is how to sing it." (Stambler, Folk & Blues, The Encyclopedia,2001.)
- I'm really extreme about keeping my word, especially to myself. So if I must go back on my word, it's after a major internal struggle. The worst one was when I vowed never to work in retail again. I could see the inevitable coming, and how I fought it inside! But I ended up going back to it for 3 lo-o-n-n-g years.
Honey Cornbread Muffin-
This position is hourly with commission for sales, and is a contract position. You will be helping Bizideo by finding potential clients and showing them our video solutions. We do have some leads to start you off, and this isn’t just a cold calling position where you call every number on a list although cold calling will be part of your job. We are looking for a reliable, honest person to help find and build business relationships with companies who could benefit from our services/solutions. You will have access to our project manager as well as developers if you have questions. (Meaning you won’t have to guess at quotes.)
All thrifted between 10-20$ a piece.
Perhaps some will be offended by what I'm about to say. So, allow me to apologize now. And I invite you to read beyond the part that may offend you. There's a point to the thought I'm having on this issue.
Currently, competition for this merchandise is very high on the US market. If the US authorities decide to levy a tax or high tariffs on this commodity, steel companies will find it harder to export welded carbon steel pipes to the US. Moreover, as this is a dual petition (anti-dumping and countervailing duty), Vietnamese steelmakers are at more of a disadvantage.
* Insterburg & Co. - Raucherhusten-Blues
Today we are looking at Acts 27:21. “But after long abstinence Paul stood forth in the midst of them, and said, Sirs, ye should have hearkened unto me, and not loosed fromCrete, and to have gained this harm and loss.” In my words, “I told you so.”
I suppose it's a sort of payback for all of the pictures that I took of her in babyhood. If you have photographed your child in the bathtub, be aware that someday they may pay you back. It may happen in preschool when Grandma gives them a camera. I guess that's better than waiting until we're old and senile and unable to defend our dignity. Maybe by that time she will at least have enough discretion to keep them off of Facebook. But at the same time there is something else to consider. If she threatens me with blackmail, then I am equally well armed. I will not post MY blackmail material here ... unless she gives me no other choice.
The project broke down like this:
Not only was this my opportunity to help out a great cause, which by the way was able to raise $300+ in a 50/50 raffle, but it also afforded me the opportunity to head out to the Greenhouse Tavern. I have talked about it. I have watched many videos about the place, but I have never had the opportunity to head down to the Tavern to enjoy the deliciousness that is Jonathon Sawyer's cooking.
Chuck and Friends: Friends for the Long Haul iPhone/iPad app. This app by the Ruckus Media Group is an original story of more than 70 pages that contains narrative-driven matching, touch and reveal and spelling activities that progress the adventure and teach letter recognition, picture/word association and basic problem solving. Users can read the story, have it read to them, or even record their own voice for a personalized reading experience. H&R really enjoyed this app after watching the Chuck and Friends Big Air Dare DVD that came in the official BlogHer swag bag. H is a stage 1 reader so he was having fun reading the story himself! If you don't want to wait till the end of this giveaway, you can get the Chuck and Friends app during the Ruckus Media Group's special back-to-school promotion with pricing of $0.99 per app on its entire digital library of 15 apps for iPhone, iPad and iTouch from Friday, August 26 through the Labor Day weekend, ending Tuesday, September 7, 2011.
Charles smiled. But it couldn’t banish the bite of incipient failure.
I’d like to ask Canadians of all shapes and sizes the following questions. You see, I’m having trouble reconciling the country I live in at the moment, and perhaps the answers will provide insight. You’ll help, won’t you? You know, because Canadians are known world-wide as friendly and helpful?
I digress...
I came bopping over and we struck up a conversation. He was unlike any other lame guy that would come into the bar and smile at me - he was genuine and wasn't looking for anything more than someone nice to chat with and bring him a gin and tonic.
Minor quibbles were offered regarding choosing the correct brush head for one's skin type. For extremely sensitive skin a dermatologist suggested an every-other-day routine.
You might wonder how to find your local extension. If you go to this USDA website you can click on your state and find your local extension. I would use them as much as you can as the information they provide is extensive, and specific to your area.
Then the burgers. I ordered the Salmon burger done banh mi style (carrots, cilantro, jalapenos, lettuce) - oh so good! Drew had a make your own creation beef burger with jalapenos, mustard, and grilled onions. We didn't really discuss the food much because we were too busy eating! Other options on the bar menu look great too! Next time I might jump out there and try Mina's lamb burger.
That's all for now. I have some cute projects that I've been working on and I hope to get to share them soon!
That’s reassuring.
I am personally at a crossroads with the Olympics: I see where the Olympics have come from (hundreds of millions of dollars spent for corporate interests, the displacement and oppression of Vancouver’s most marginalized people, the non-acknowledgment of BC’s historical occupation of First Nations’ land, absurd amounts of people lining up for ephemeral pleasures) and yet I still enjoy watching athletes compete on the television and holding my hopes high for another gold medal for Canada. But there are always good aspects about bad things.
Time to pull out Plan B or better known as "Operation Mommy better pull something quick out of her pants to save the day or there will be hell to pay later."
Waiting for the applause that never seems to arrive
* The winner will be drawn at random (the more points you have, the more entries you'll get)
An initial investigation revealed the two knew each other and there may have been drugs involved.
Third, we must pursue the peace and joy that comes from experiencing forgiveness in Christ. Our sins are wrapped inside of other sins and it takes time and effort to get to the root of the problem. If we only confess the first layer of our sin, our sense of joy and peace will be as superficial (Ps. 51:14-17).
We are visiting Charlotte
At first things were sooo much better. No more peaking around the corner to see if Spot was waiting to charge. No more displays of fowl aggression on mankind. Everything seemed so peaceful...until we noticed that some of the hens looked rather abused.
Query Shark: yes I read all the archives." fiction 78K words/historical/romantic/thriller.
1 dance
Amtrak is already fully compliant with – or some might say they regularly capitulate to – the DHS and child agencies, as evidenced not only by the TSA teams which swoop in on their trains but also by the case I reported on recently in which a college student was detained for quite a while, interrogated and harassed simply for being in Islamic Studies.
In other news, my one day figure workshop last Friday was SO fun! Everyone did SUCH a great job! Here are my 'kids'
At Sport18, we believe in serving up sport with a dash of fun and lots of professionalism. But even though we have professionals backing up each and every organisational aspect of India Cyclothon, we feel that it is the commitment and enthusiasm of volunteers that gives the event just that additional joie de vivre that gives the event its flavour.
ME: "I'd like to punch Doe in the tit but I'm hanging in there."
I also wanted to show ya'll what I brought home last night! My mom is the founder of Spark Ministry, and last night they had a big fundraiser. Spark is an organization that plans mission trips for women just like you and me to travel to women's shelters and give the ladies in the program a weekend retreat. The weekends are filled with pampering, worship, great food, and lots of love! It was a great night last night and they raised alot of money for the upcoming year. These were the centerpieces...aren't they so pretty!
Headlines at Politico spun the primary victories as a leftward march: “No Centrists Need Apply,” wrote Charlie Mahtesian, while a the site’s “In the Arena” feature asked: “Will Dems’ moderate purge backfire?” Never mind that, prior to the election, the Times had quoted David Wasserman, an editor at the authoritative Cook Political Report, as saying, “There is an ideological tinge because Cartwright is more liberal and Holden is a Blue Dog. But that’s not really the reason Holden’s vulnerable. It’s much more because of redistricting,” which meant Holden was unfamiliar to 80% of his new constituency. By contrast, Cartwright’s law firm had run TV commercials in the area for years.
If anything, it’s more about trusting each other and commitment to community than intentional evasion. Perhaps that’s one of the reasons our marriage has not only grown in years, it’s thrived.
Fair Spring slides hither o'er the Southern sea,
The Lovely Bones by Alice Sebold - this was a book everyone raved about a few years ago; I was reluctant to read it as I thought it sounded heart-breaking - the story is narrated by a young girl who has been murdered by a neighbour and looks at how her family is affected by her death. I did find it very sad but it was well done;
I might just go plea.
Thus even without considering the evidence offered in the declaration of Bruce Ward the Court can find that the download of music files by Henriksen constitutes transacting business in the District. As the Court of Appeals in Gorman noted, the fact that the transactions between defendant and residents of the District of Columbia occurred in cyberspace “is not some mystical incantation capable of warding off the jurisdiction of courts built from bricks and mortar.” 293 F.3d at 510. See also Material Supply Intern., Inc. v. Sunmatch Industrial Co., 62 F.Supp.2d 13 (D.D.C.1999) (noting that a single act may be sufficient to transact business and that defendant need not ever be physically present in the district to transact business within the meaning of the statute). All of the aforementioned acts represent transactions between a district resident and defendant that have given rise to consequences in the District.
a. a scanner for producing from said color original a set of three
Then Linda and I waited while the medical team huddled and conferred, coordinated and came up with a new plan for my future.
Yesterday was a long but quite awesome day. First I spent most of the day at this tutor education at uni, since I’m going to be a tutor for exchange students this coming autumn. Part of the day was actually quite fun and oh my god the food, haha. But once we were separated from the normal tutors things went weird. It seems like the whole thing is just so badly organized and we didn’t get to know anything about what we’ll have to do and what they’ll do or literally anything. I have no words.
Michael Cocks added this comment to Mike Tymn’s post: “Our personal experiences do lead us to try and describe reality in differing ways. On the one hand, there is strong evidence that our individual consciences and points of view survive death of the body. On the other hand, there is strong evidence that we are all connected to each other in the network of the whole in an infinity of ways…. And that makes a slippery place when trying to define things. There is always “on the one hand.. and then the other.” On the one hand, from a mass of interlocking linguistic, historical, and personal evidence, the people talking to Stephen the Martyr were sure we were talking to this “Famous ‘Dead’ Person.” We were impressed with his humility, wisdom… and love. But on the other hand Stephen was insisting that he and we are all each other, and all others, all manifestations of the Source of all things, that he was reminding us of the knowledge we had before we entered our present incarnations. More narrowly though, he said he was talking with us as fellow members of a like minded spiritual group. And yes, on the one hand individual spirits are at all stages of development, and there are destructive spirits; yet on the other hand developed and undeveloped are together in a synchronistic whole.”
However, if you would like to add the sauce:
After an hour or so, one of the staff, an American, joined us out in the pool, but he actually got in as we stayed along the edge. We asked him the curious questions about where he came from, etc. which somehow eventually led to him explain that right behind us used to stand a 4-story apartment building, pre-earthquake. We turned around and looked at what remained of the building – only the flat, concrete foundation.
I panicked, of course, because I knew I had nothing to help rectify this matter. "Here's a newspaper!" I said, tossing the ad circulars I'd read while waiting out ball practice. "Hold these to your nose while I think if what to do!"
Patient: "Do you have samples?"
When you will be assisting a disabled person, ask yourself three questions:
You can see where I got completely lost on Fremont — the loops give it away.
You are immersed in innocence. The kids are just kids doing kid stuff. I can’t tell you how refreshing it is to watch a large studio, big-budget movie that succeeds on delivering romance without innuendo, childhood without whiny victimization and a complete total lack of questionable language anywhere.
I don’t believe much in Behaviorism in a sense that you just react to whatever happened to you. That may be true for animals yes, but for a human with a complex thought organization, that should not be the case. (disclaimer: I am not rebuking Behaviorism since as a psychologist, that is so wrong in many ways). In this thought process, one should not just say “I’ve been dominated by the women in my life, I can’t help it but look for and have a woman to dominate and release all these emotions”. Or “Since women in my life are always talking and nagging about something, I will look for someone who will just shut up.”
Susan Roberts Santa Nutcracker
HRH The Duke of Cambridge K.C.
This information fed into bespoke sessions for programme teams. These were far better-attended than institution-wide sessions.
If you have any questions, please contact INAC directly as they would have the official information that relates to your specific individual situation.
06 Up in the Sky
Nigerians can be settled if the government would learn to follow the rule of law
We put the kids in the Y's childcare for a bit so we could exercise for real. I headed for the elliptical machines, the cool ones with TVs attached to them. Everyone around me watched news or sports but I threw caution to the wind -- let them judge me! -- and watched The Golden Girls. It was the episode where Dorothy sleeps with her ex-husband, Stan, and then considers getting back together with him. "Don't do it, Dorothy," I cried, "He cheated on you with that bimbo Krissy, remember?" The guy next to me startled a bit when I laughed out loud but I couldn't help myself -- that Sophia is such a pistol.
Winning number is #13
Save $0.50 on Dawn Hand Renewal, Power Clean, Bleach Alternative or Oxi
Below is the response of OMB's IP Czar Victoria Espinel to my signing a petition to Stop Online Piracy Act. Basically, the Administration wants to push ahead with legislation but has agreed with many of the concerns voiced by the public:
GREAT FOOD - FRED MADDEN will be arranging the most spectacular display of incredible food from some of the best festival caterers in the country - pigs on spits, the double decker bus gang, Redmond from Mayo, Lisa McCabe and the Beattie Chipper... and a lovely coule from Ennisskillen who roast non-nuclear wholea nimals ..... you won't starve at the Flat Lake and you won't pay and arm and a leg either ! Pass the sauce.
I have in the past with jobs been laid off, fired, given 6 months to find another job for no reason other than it was the whim of the Senior Pastor. I have dealt with the pain of my wife having a miscarriage. I have dealt with the struggles of having a child sick and flown by life flight. I have had friends turn on me and completely disappoint me with their behavior and attitudes. I have dealt with family members who were seriously depressed and others who dealt with anxiety and panic attacks. I have lived having to rob Peter to pay Paul financially. You know what though – I have in all these things seen God work and do powerful and amazing things. You know what else – everyone has bad things happen to them.
Now here is something I commonly like to refer to as Pin-Up girl hair. A nice little curl in the front (ya know where your bangs are supposed to be) and a swept under curl in the back to show off your neck. It’s fun and cute and wildly popular with those hipster chics. (See previous blog if you are unsure if you fit the “Hipster” category). This looks good on just about anyone with curves. FINALLY! We have a cut for our own kind. The curvature of the hair style accentuates the curves of the body, and if it doesn’t, well, then you did it wrong. I once did this hair style for a friend who wanted to do a Pin-Up shoot with her a the drag-race girl. I don’t think I quite mastered it but, eh, that’s what Photoshop is for: to make you look like you knew what you were doing in the first place. (By the way, just kidding, this is NOT what Photoshop is for at all).
Here's the problem, though: because this requirement appears in the EULA, rather than as a separate agreement you can consider post-download, you are binding yourself to Apple's terms simply by downloading the software, even though you may not have known the terms were there before you clicked the download button. Wineman says,
Maria Menounos & Derek Hough – Fox Trot
Her smile dies in still birth
percent of our GDP on defence!
-against-
Sagrada Familia
There is one breed of men that am trying to have a huge grudge on and its with bitter regret that I am calling them men.
For your convenience, I have added links below from Durango & Silverton’s web site.
Back in June, I was selected as a juror for what turned out to be a three-week-long criminal trial in Kings County Supreme Court. By pure coincidence, the crime took place at the NYCHA Albany Houses in Crown Heights where the victim, the defendant, and multiple witnesses lived. I explained to the judge and attorneys during the selection process that I was a local resident and blogger, but they felt this didn't disqualify me and they kept me on the case. The experience was unlike any other I've had, and one that I'm thankful for despite the sense of profound frustration it left with me. After kicking it around my head all summer and talking it to pieces with friends and family, I feel I've finally got enough perspective to tackle it here. I'm also out of town this week, which makes a short serial on the trial a convenient way to keep writing. Here goes:
register of interests in the House of Lords also lists him as an adviser to Warburg Pincus International Ltd, a private equity firm, which has significant investments in the healthcare industry. It even rescued United Healthcare from financial ruin in 1987 and helped it to become one of the largest healthcare companies in the world. He can now help it to become one of the biggest
The following primary sources are available online:
There are three main pro’s for this Jackson Jekyll doll. First, he comes with a stand! Unlike the exclusive sets Mattel released in past months, Jackson does come with a stand. This is helpful, especially since he doesn’t stand well on his own. Also, unlike past male dolls, Jackson has jointed wrists. He can easily be manipulated to hold items or pose with other dolls. The third pro? Jackson’s hair. It is so much better than it was on his original ‘Gloom Beach’ release. His ‘Basic’ hair is still locked down with a ton of hair gel, but if it bugs you, it’s very easy to wash out.
+ 3 challenging boss fights
I already knew I loved him more than anything, but it was that moment, when he limped his way over the finish line, that I realized I could not be more in love with anyone in my entire life. It may also been a side effect of the high you feel from running, but I was so incredibly happy, happy with life, happy with him, just happy with everything.
There is the case of a famous, high-rating TV chat show where the producer asked a PR person for major star A as a guest on the show. It would have been a coup for the show. The PR said, “Well, if you want A on the show, it would be nice if you could also put X on the show.”
What's up with Orion's wild goose chase of riddles though? Makes more sense to leave one full message but oh well. Oh, Amy was more whiny in this installment so I wasn't crazy about that. Also, Elder seemed a bit off here too but by book's end ..he delivered!
adventure, and I doubt that many people reading this are afraid to be
One of the most robust criticisms of Marx is that, despite his predictions, society has yet to be shaken by a popular revolution against the capitalist system, and a global class revolt doesn’t seem to be in the works any time soon, either. Why? Clearly because of the jogging and fitness craze which first germinated back in the 1970s and is in full bloom today. Although they may comprise a small percent of the population, I’d have to say the reason we’re all still waiting for fulfillment of that utopian promise is due to runners and joggers. No matter how dreary the day job is, they are still by and large happily united with their labor at least a few times each week. As a result, things never quite reach the boiling point necessary for a real gloves-off revolution. We could try to usher in a communist era by getting rid of running and runners completely, but that seems impractical and, well, a bit hostile. Perhaps, had he lived in a different age, Marx would have been a physical trainer or a P.E. major, and the social upheaval he envisioned would have come not from one massive thrust, but millions of individuals discovering this: run, and become your own revolution.
in company with men who work iniquity,
Pinterest, Facebook, magazines..or your friends? Tell us how you get inspired and you could win $50 cash! https://www.surveymonkey.com/s/inspire_apr2012
From Bokgoni to Tshwane FM “former Top Stereo” and now launching an album, clearly it takes passion, positive character and dedication to get this far.
The weather was kind of letting us down so we decided to see if the Hell’s Kitchen Flea Market was any good and maybe even tented. Well, it was OK, but it’s probably better to visit when the weather is really nice and there are more vendors.
While serving the dessert mix the fruit with custard and serve it cold.
SPECIAL ACHIEVEMENT AWARD (Last year’s winner was Gavin Blyth, Emmerdale)
The ultimate reason for everything in life is to give glory to God the creator of everything!
Best of all, you can use this gift certificate on any of my upcoming promotions.
My heart is so heavy right now, I feel like I am living in fear. I fear the phone ringing, especially at odd times of the day, such as this morning at 7 am. No one ever calls my house that early, unless something is wrong. My stepdad was calling to tell me my moms heart rate and blood pressure has rocketed back up again. When I left on Sun it was down to normal and she seemed to be doing better. However this morning her heart rate was double and blood pressure back up and she is in pain.
 More and more taxes will be squeezed out of the still productive Whites to pay for the deteriorating, racially darkened, society and to maintain its infrastructure.
Anyway, here is my submission for Would you ever Guess? this is where we show you what your cartridges can do ... just not the main project...
The kids got lots of good stuff this year and it's always great to see their excitement. It was also a blessing to be having this Christmas in our own home! Last year I never would have guessed that we'd be here a year later. I'm so thankful for all that God has blessed us with this year!!
“See, I lay a stone in Zion, a tested stone,
:: There's also some hot water drain return to make sure we have on-demand hot water whenever we need it and drain heat recovery lines somewhere mixed in there as well.
ALONE.
There are many things in life we want to do… Travel the world, Learn a new language, Become a rockstar (Some dreams bigger than others), Raise money for charity by running/cycling ”x” amount of miles, Even jumping out of a plane in a cow suit (This might only be mine)…
Was spaghetti squash always really good and I just didn’t know it, or have my tastes changed that wildly over the years? The reality of 30 is pushing me towards explanation #2, but I probably won’t be positive for another decade or so. I’ll continue to analyze and let y’all know in 2017. (Lucky you.)
There is a lot going on over at the Fresh Brewed Challenge blog
Last Friday AJ's two wish givers came over for a special goodbye party for AJ and our whole family. We have been so blessed working with Make A Wish (MAW) and these two fab wish givers (Laurie and Karen) who went above and beyond to make this a special time for AJ.
First, put a couple of paper towels on your cutting board (unless you want a red-dyed cutting board). Cut off the ends (I went a tad bit deep) and then score the sides, just until the pith (white stuff)...
Tonight I was one of the first on the Cambridge-Norwich train, but some ten minutes later, still at the station, there was loud music. A huge black guy entered and swung past, his phone turned up to top volume in an act I took to be one of old fashioned audio-imperialism: This space is mine and I will fill it with my music. He slumped down across the aisle the next seat up. A boy followed him and sat opposite him, facing me. I signalled to the boy that his friend might put his earphones on. The boy smiled shyly and helplessly. The train started. Eventually the music went off and there were a few minutes of silence. At that point an old Glaswegian sitting across from me received a call on his mobile. His ring tone was the first whistled bar from The Good, the Bad and the Ugly.
But at the HEART, we are all the same.
My first fall creation is a harvest pumpkin ale bread. I've done a little baking with bread before but after trying a chocolate guinness cupcake at our town's Oktoberfest last month, I knew I could make a cupcake way better that. Don't worry, I'll be blogging about the cupcakes later this week, but back to the bread. I came home one evening to a cold 6 pack of Sam Adams Octoberfest beer in my fridge. PERFECT!
Country : UK
I do miss my Thanksgiving as a child and having my parents with me.
See how the Bible opens: “In the beginning God.” Let your life open in the same way. Seek with your whole soul, first and foremost, the kingdom of God, as the place of your citizenship, and His righteousness as the character of your life. As for the rest, it will come from the Lord Himself without your being anxious concerning it. All that is needful for this life and godliness “shall be added unto you.”
Want to live longer? Get leaner. That’s the message of a study published in The Lancet, a British medical journal, concluding that “moderate obesity typically shortens life span by about three years.”
24 - Why do psychics have to ask you for your name?
02 One And Only
I do have to apologize. I have been so bad about blogging lately, but I have a really good excuse. I am carrying triplets and I'm tired! It seems like every time I sit down and have a free moment, my eyes start to get really droopy and before I know it I'm out. I usually just cat nap for a few and feel much better. I really didn't think there would be THAT much difference from carrying one baby to carrying three. I know, I know wishful thinking and very naive on my part. I am a can do kind of person though. As it turns out, there are a lot of differences. For instance, you know that extreme fatigue you get in the first trimester? It never stops. In fact it gets worse! I find myself planning my days with a couple of breaks in the middle for cat naps. It's crazy how much energy these three munchkins are using up.
Now comes the fun part – determining the threats offensive capabilities. Right up front don’t assume any type of threat is going to be lacking in firepower. If I can Google lightning link and order an FA bolt carrier then so can any other dirtbag on the net. Those same .pdf files everyone downloads are also widely available to the threat forces as well. See that pic up top? Well those ain’t water balloons. You need to assume that the threat has the capability to employ serious firepower including automatic weapons, explosives, and possibly even ad hoc armored vehicles. Ehh? Naw surely they won’t employ bombs. Yup – there’s been a couple of instances just this year of IEDs being found in busts and even attempted IED attacks against cops and rival gangs in Oklahoma, California, and Georgia. There’s a simple truth here – all four of the types of violent organizations I outlined in the last entry have increased their lethality exponentially over the last five to ten years. Gang members are well documented in the military. Hamas has a known presence in Mexico cooperating with the Narco-cartels.
1) as dough before being baked
I'm trying to make Madeleine!
Is 40:30,31 Even the youths shall faint and be weary, and the young men shall utterly fall: but those who wait on the Lord shall renew their strength; they shall mount up with wings as eagles; they shall run and not be weary; they shall walk and not faint.
Lucy~
Now I’m looking forward to a wonderful massage (haven’t had one for 4 weeks due to work commitments and I usually have them fortnightly). Then I start work at 2pm. Now I just have to decide what to make for dinner tonight!
(This post is incomplete. Numerous changes and additions will be made over the coming days)
They began spraying at 215p.m.. Continued spraying until 230p.m.. By 240p.m. the entire sun was hidden under a blanket of chemicals. The trails started out skinny then opened and created a thin layer across the sky. Connecting the grids that were made.
'Run' I say - shout even - to the Glam Ass who is idly pulling up weeds in the orchard. 'Run - get the camera. Quick, quick, quick!' (Some speed is needed because I know from experience how quickly the sky will change - so I'm not just being bossy.)
cumin seeds- 1/4 tsp
It felt kind of awesome to be going off with the full marathoner group, but that feeling quickly disappeared when I realized that I was heading up another big hill. I don’t know how I could have misread the elevation chart so badly, but the second half of this course was not at all easy or flat. It was relentless. I was starting to really feel the effects of the heat too. I hydrated as much as I possibly could, taking gatorade / water and dumping a cup of water over my head at every water stop. I took my second gel at mile 15.5 and charged up the hill knowing I was going to see my family again just before mile 17. I was not doing well at this point, but I was singularly focused on just getting to my family. I stopped again for a quick stretch once I met them and thankfully Mike was planning on running with me from mile 17 – 21. I needed him.
This happens just because of a Very High Wrong and Repulsive match of South-South or North-North HUMAN MAGNETIC FIELD of the person or relation in your Life.
Patricia Mayen-Salazar ... Gloria
"What?" I asked.
If you're a regular reader, you already know that these days, the wonders of the web has shrunk the world and that it is possible to make friends with like-minded souls, all around the globe. And one such friend of recent is Jodie Lee (aka Gypsy Chick). We bonded over a mutual love for vintage design and the brilliant news that she had been asked by a company we both adore, Prima, to design some of their latest collections.
Social Studies: (History, Geography, and Cultural Studies)
Moral of the story: Have more patience than I do, read the manual. This taught me a precious lesson, when it is time to share my genes with the world an engage in procreation I will be more prepared. I will totally read What to Expect When You're Expecting so I don't mess that one up. Alberico is my practice child.
I don’t need to read the inscription underneath. I know that off by heart.
it made me laugh & smile within myself and feel a pure love for these little ones.
I have some more Sation beauties to show you over the next week. Sation bottles are oval with thick glass bottoms. The new brushes are great for ladies like me that love wide brushes. The formula on all the ones I've tried is excellent. You can purchase Sation's Big 3 Free polishes at their website.
Love cooking? Try these tasty, nutritious recipes:
Pendragon: Begin.
This brings me to today. I woke up with dark circles under my eyes, despite getting plenty of sleep. We didn't get to our school time because I was busy trying to find cheaper car insurance (saving the rantings about how much I hate getting car insurance quotes for another day- which luckily for you means never because I'll forget!) Our big plans include staying home and resting, because everyone is getting a little crazy out of sheer exhaustion.
It's an ever-expanding scene in Crown Heights. NYRR's Brooklyn Half-Marathon, which sold 15,000 entries in one day today, now starts at Washington and Eastern and heads south to Empire before heading back up Flatbush. Meanwhile, the ol' Google Alert for "Crown Heights" turned up an pair of laudatory articles about the area from a pair of websites that likely don't end up in the same feed all that often, one from queer blog Autostraddle that proclaimed CH "Park Slope's queer, quirky half-brother" and another from the buttoned-down folks at Real Estate Weekly that called the area "up and coming" but then included an inexplicable quote from a broker who claimed the neighborhood "benefit(s) from being close to waterfront neighborhoods." Come again? Still, always interesting to see who's watching Crown Heights (and keep those reader updates coming!).
If you’re up for a challenge, you can create your own historical costumes with your children. You don’t have to start from scratch. If you do want to cut and sew your own costume, you can buy a pattern from a local fabric store. Patterns are available for many different kinds of historic dress. If you do choose to sew your own costume, you can easily combine the lesson with an arts or “home ec” lesson.
I happen to have been a French General fan for quite some time now. Maybe it's the French part, maybe it's the vintage part. Either way, HUGE FAN.
To spend a lifetime trying to seek love would end in heartbreak.
Blonde Bombshell - 4.5% - Blonde ale
The Oldham Beer Festival was a success. We effectively sold out, so though I won't bore you with the details, a big thanks to all that attended. The standard CAMRA three pints a head formula seemed to apply, so for those that didn't know how these things are worked out, you know now.
Also…um…
The group recorded inserts for their pre-recorded presentation that will be aired on Friday the 2nd October when Bush Radio 89.5 FM broadcasts from the island as the school comes to an end.
Just as Lisa Koll is the conference’s most dominating athlete on the women’s side, hurdler Ronnie Ash may be on the men’s side. Ash leads the nation in the high hurdles at 13.31 – his winning time here – and has five races under 13.60 this season.Only WR holder Dayron Robles and current world leader David Oliver have run faster this season. Ash should head into Eugene as one of the strongest favorites in the meet having won the title last year while at Bethune Cookman.
Difference: -3.4
3. Penalty for filing late is usually 5 percent of the unpaid taxes for each month or part of the month a return is late, the penalty will not exceed 25 percent of your unpaid taxes.
I was particularly interested in following the voices of the under-represented: from the youth who used social media to mobilize the uprisings to the women who had long been engaged in revolution-precursor labor movements to Egypt’s Coptic Christian minority.
I was shopping at citi centre in RKS in Chennai when i heard the news about the earthquake. The tsunami warning came up and warned everyone that around 5 there’d be a chance of a tsunami in Chennai and that people better stay indoors.
Really? How easy? After all, MA state law requires parental consent for any girl under the age of 18 to get an abortion. No problemo, good ol' Maria has an answer for everything, including the caveat for my praise of PP's site that I mentioned in the first paragraph (emphasis mine):
This morning when I was flipping through the pages in my bible the Lord brought me to this verse:
Last time I used Book Two, so I'm trying Book One this time. I love that all I have to do is print off the Week One shopping list, then head to the shops to get it all. The shopping didn't take me any longer than usual. I love that I now know exactly what each breakfast, lunch and dinner will be for the entire week. No more thinking. And it is fun trying new recipes and eating healthy, wholesome, unprocessed food. Tonight we had a yummy rack of lamb, yesterday salmon and veges, and the capsicum and tomato soup for yesterday's lunch was easy, light and delicious.
Once you’ve created a “room” you like, you can either click “Save draft” to save it for later, or click “Publish”. Clicking “Publish” is the only way you’ll be able to save the photo in your own computer file.
A girl that has half her heart in the South and half in New York
The most productive learning experience for students whether online or in face-to-face classes can often be the interaction among students and with an instructor. Online teaching and Social Network Analysis (SNA) offer the opportunity to examine intellectual social networking and strategies that promotes student interaction which can enhance learning. This study focuses on two online courses in which we used Social Network Analysis (SNA) techniques to evaluate and compare student and instructor interactions of two online courses (Lesley University, Cambridge, MA and Instituto Piaget, Lisbon, Portugal). One course was taught by an experienced online instructor and the other by an instructor new to the online teaching format.
After applying a crumb coating over the whole cake, and a second coating over the top of the cake, I started to decorate my sides. I was inspired by the red and yellow stripes of Martha Stewart's carnival cake, and thought the look would go perfectly with this cake. I had brainstormed different ways to make the carnival stripes, but in the end went with the original idea (see below, my brainstorming sketches for the cookies and the cake).
I stopped in the rest area and hooked up my hose and pulled the valve open - the hose blew apart! I stepped in my own mess and closed the valve, got the water hose and cleaned it up. Threw the hose in the trash and got another (I was carrying three of them). As I twisted the second on to the connection, one of the hooks broke off. Another one in the trash. One last chance. I got the tanks dumped, but the last hose leaked a bit (from age I guess), so it went in the trash, too. I moved the motorhome forward a bit and washed every bit of evidence down the drain, washed my boots (glad I wasn't wearing sandals) and headed for Camping World in Tacoma to get a new hose - and my new mattress. Except for idiots that tried to merge in to the coach (do they really think that I am going to stop on the hiway to let them in?) and the fools that I see texting as they travel down the road (I refuse to call it driving), the rest of the trip was uneventful.
What's your criteria for deciding which fabrics to stock?
I have fond memories of our anniversary at the Trump a couple of years ago. The bath tub was the size of our Corolla and the bathroom had a TV in the mirror. We drank champagne and watched Tommy Boy from the tub. And lo it was awsome. I was suitably stoked about securing an all out baller place to have this shindig.
Thank you 2010!
Part of me wants to cut to make ammends for talking to Jacob. To undo what I have done. But it doesn't undo anything, it just does. It does more damage.
1t vanilla
I spoke to an alcoholic who reached ‘rock bottom’ and lost everything but then became liberated; a woman who has lived in a state of wakefulness ever since being told she had breast cancer; a woman whose daughter died and who lost her business and savings in the aftermath, but suddenly shifted into an enlightened state and has never grieved for her daughter since. I spoke to a man who became paralyzed after falling from a bridge onto a river bed, who struggled for months with pain and despair, then underwent a spiritual rebirth and now lives in a state of permanent bliss. I also interviewed a 90-year-old man named Russell Williams who underwent transformation over 60 years ago, after a long period of mental torment brought on by his experiences in the Second World War. As he described it:
This story does have a happy ending. In the end we were able to convince the children to return to school where they remain today. As I write this letter, they are studying in a classroom 100 feet away.
If you can’t wait and want a copy of this amazing digital scrapbooking software NOW, get a $10 discount off the purchase price and a $10 coupon for the My Memories.com store – yay! Enter the following code at checkout: STMMMS23226.
Below you will find some statistics to be aware of about auto theft.
I don’t know the answer…who does…but food for thought – perhaps we can challenge ourselves through thinking…
P.S. One other film in which she appeared with John Wayne, In Harm’s Way from 1965, has a bit of special meaning for me. My father and his Marine infantry unit, stationed in Hawaii at the time the movie was being shot, were used as extras in various scenes throughout the film. He can be seen as a jeep driver at one point, and a wounded Marine in a later scene (he’s easy to spot; just look for the guy who looks a lot like me). Somewhere in my files is a picture of him standing outside a tent with the Duke himself, which has won me no small number of beer bets over the years.
And the tempest clouds are driven.
Disdain them, break them, throw them by!
Ramsey’s heart skipped. Bloody bollocks, it skipped? He couldn’t remember the last time any woman made him react like that, not even Giselle. Or maybe, the impulsive kiss came from weakness with the dawn nearing.
Just as long as Iz doesn’t expect Sarah and I to roll round in muddy puddles like Daddy Pig and Mummy Pig do!
Then one of my loyal blog readers contacted me. She said she had a message for me and would like to do a tarot reading. I accepted and she informed me that I was on the right path and my next step was to begin a resource website for women. I thought it was foolish. I mean, how could I help women when I was so down and out myself? But I love writing and research and building websites so I decided that it wouldn’t hurt to try.I came up with the name My Savvy Sisters because I wanted to reach a caliber of women who were strategic in their life goals and hell bent on achieving their dreams. I wanted to teach women how to survive anything and I wanted to show them how to overcome their personal obstacles. In essence, I wanted to give the very assistance that I needed so much at the time. These ladies would become My Sisters and after much growing together, My Savvy Sisters, because we will be indestructible and wise enough to turn any situation into a benefit for us.
Now, now, for those of you who might happen to be Vegan, don't take offense to this, I don't think like this now and to be fair, I was brainwashed by the donkey! I mean, I grew up partially on a studding farm full of cows and one donkey. A studding farm, for those of you who've never been near a farm, means that our farm existed for the explicit purpose to breed cows so you all could eat it! Why a donkey on that kind of farm? You know, I have no idea but, I'm quite sure he snuk into my room while I was sleeping and brainwashed me! He was smart enough to do it too! Whenever you'd holler, “Hey Sporty, show me your pearly whites!”, he'd roll up his top lip and show you his teeth. He was a genius donkey, I'm telling you! :D
This is the new garage man door that we had to have cut out of the stucco garage door in order to have the doggie door inserted.
In a series of tweets which started in the morning, Tan Sri Tony Fernandes raised questions on MAHB’s operations, the effectiveness of members of parliament (MPs) and the objectivity of the Ministry of Transport (MOT).
In 2007, Shearing was knighted by Queen Elizabeth II for his contribution to music. When the honor was announced, he said it was “amazing to receive an honor for something I absolutely love doing.”
If any of my Blogville neighbours want to fess up to using any of these search terms, the time to come clean is now.
As a child I lived for 4 years in Launceston (city in the north of Tassy) so was keen to revisit places that I remember.
Vegetarian oyster sauce (optional), 1 table spoon
Mint Sprig, for garnish and flavor
I decided to decorate a white gift bag to add our gifts for our daughter's baby shower. I got the bag/bow/tag finished, and when I went to put the gifts in ... it didn't all fit!! So I had to make a 2nd gift bag, bow and tag. :-) I used a paper stack by DCWV as I love the little bit of sparkle on the papers.
And then there is the time I am sleeping over at a friend's house. I am asleep on the couch and wake up to find her older brother pushing his naked penis into my face. Do I cry out? Do I tell his parents? No. I push him back slightly and turn over to face the couch. My version of hiding in this case.
The outlook for 2011 is challenging. Hopefully NAMA and non-NAMA banks will bring more product to market. There should be some stabilization in the overall economy though domestic demand is likely to decline. Credit for Irish property is still scarce though there are reportedly pots of €10m available for quality assets with reliable rent rolls. The prediction on here is that capital prices will decline 10% this year (25% if the UORR legislation is introduced).
4 gave
New Orders Since end of day 11/30/2010, still outstanding as of end of day 12/31/2010
We stuck our head around the door of the cathedral coffee shop, which looked friendly enough but didn’t tempt us in, when we knew we would be heading to a little gem of a place for some afternoon tea. The Conservatory Tea Rooms feel like you’re stepping back to a world of “Brief Encounter” and the 1930s, although the place has actually only been there since the 1980s! Great little cream tea, which is apparently Wakefield’s answer to ‘Betty’s', only about half the price.
FB: Okay, Jews and Negroes are bad. But weren’t white people responsible for letting the Jews in this country and allowing them to participate in public life to begin with?
This is a reference to Judges 6:36-40,
The consequences are all too predictable.
NAGC ANNUAL AWARDS. Each year at its annual conference NAGC presents a variety of awards. The nomination process for the 2012 awards closes on May 1. Award categories include those for educators, researchers, scholars, advocates, and those who otherwise serve the gifted community. Find out more.
My whole trip to town was spent pondering how I would cope if the traffic lights perched on the first hill into town were red. Of course it was red, and I performed a particularly nasty version of a handbrake hill-start. I'm hopeful the driver of the small Festiva behind me has since recovered.
Jesus & The Mary Chain Happy when it rains UK
Feelings…Morris Albert
Writing a language dumb,
A few days ago I was fortunate enough to have the Zombie Rabbit award bestowed upon me.......a gift from the very lovely and talented Jinx. I discovered her blog after she started following my blog, and I'm so glad she did. Not only is she another Foxy Female that loves The Scary, her blog rocks as well. AND she just got a kitten and gave it an awesome name, Bebe Gunns. Kittens everywhere with names like Bootsie and Fluffy are seething with jealousy. So check out Totally Jinxed. Tell her Mama sent ya.
However this contradicts the old mother’s dying statement to Captain Koos Venter, the police officer who had found the mortally-wounded mother and daughter.
Based on a few months of virtual exploration—nowhere near Tahrir Square—I would not presume to form an opinion either. But confusion, uncertainty, instability—none are strangers to the aftermath of revolutions. And election results notwithstanding, Egyptians cannot dodge monumental economic and social challenges ahead.
I was going to pack for London tonight but I think that can wait until tomorrow. Right now is a bath and a light dinner. And more ibuprofen.
I've been away from my blog for some time, and thought I would just check in for a quick update on what's going on in my world. We are nearing the end of closing my uncle's estate and I'm slowly getting control of my life again! Whew... the temptation to rant and rave about the frustration, stress and mind blowing dealings with crazed family and the legal system has been a huge battle - I'm proud of myself for not tainting my blog with all that BS! Unfortunately, my husband hasn't been able to duck my worries and complaining, how I love that man, how does he put up with me?! Lots of trials and tribulations indeed but I keep reminding myself to count our blessings and keep plugging along! I can finally see the end nearing, though not fast enough!
Make the mascarpone mousse: Fill a medium pot one-third full with water and bring it to a gentle simmer over medium heat. Put the egg yolks and 1/3 cup plus 1 tablespoon (80 grams) sugar in a bowl that will fit snugly on top of the pot but not touch the water. Reduce the heat to low and place the bowl over the pot. Whisk until the mixture is very hot and starts to thicken, about 5 minutes. Remove from the heat, and continue whisking until the mixture cools.
Prior to being murdered, Evangelista wrote an enormous, self-published book of religious ravings based loosely on the bible. It took him 20 years. “The Oldest History of the World: Discovered by Occult Science” It is unreadable, useless and no one bought it. In the fictional account three prophets travel to “Afra” in order to “see what the colored people were doing…” but all they were doing was eating their food uncooked.
Sorted.
Aryeh Deri: Loser
Adieu!
Tattoo: HUZ Tattoos – Henna Reborn – Original
I think I mentioned in a previous post that Craigie's surviving Bedlingtons (two, I think) have now moved to Bath and are now in the care of a gay couple who were good friends of his, and who also happen to be friends with some friends of mine - I have yet to bump into the famous dogs on the street, but I am looking forward to it.
In fact, it was the exact opposite of fun.
Physical Education
They are very small and delicate, but quite lovely. The area behind our house and a natural spring that seeps up and creates a wet boggy area that is perfect for swampy woodland plants. i would really love to establish some lady slipper orchids here. i was told by a neighbor that they used to come up on our side of the creek, but i have yet to ever find them.
Gopnik adapts a high style, filling the article to the brim with words that almost require Dictionary.com and references even obscure for the sports fan. Gopnik uses words like “stolid” and “milquetoasts” in describing people, which are hardly common words to be found in the typical sports article. Gopnik also makes constant references to Canadian figures, such as Ken Dryden, which become obscure because the joke falls outside of the realm of the typical American audience the New Yorker caters to; however, this heavy usage of high style falls in line with the type of article typically expected from the magazine, retaining their average reader, sports fan or not.
-- Exam week schedules always discombobulate me, and I think I am degenerating into the stereotypical absent-minded professor at an alarming rate. I almost gave an exam to the wrong freaking class today. I walked into the room at what I thought was the correct time, and was surprised to see that the seats were filled with about twice as many students as I was expecting, and they were (mostly) the wrong ones. Fortunately, it turns out that the actual exam time for my class is tomorrow and not yesterday. Whew. Now I just have to get through the next two days, which will include giving the real exam for that class, proctoring a different exam for one of my colleague's classes, and keeping appointments for two students to take make-up exams. Oh, and taking my car in for repairs. I'm going to be so confused.
(Head, Funds Release Supervisor)
Spanky’s dead ex-girlfriend.
Reality - I have lost weight before. I know I can do it. I am just one of these people who has to have their head in the right place to do it successfully. At the same time, it is frustrating as a little part of me does want to do it. I also think I'm out of the routine on keeping my food intake in check. I know that it might take a few weeks of living through a bit of hunger first to adjust and get back into it. Which is worrying as that will take me into December and only a couple of weeks before my target date. Because of this, I am beginning to think that this is now not an achievable goal at all.
I won't ever choose your eye liner with you or walk you towards the morning sun,
“Nick pooed?” I ask.
I learned too, about the growing habits of certain vegetables and how to manage them so you don't end up with vegetables and vines growing totally out of control...
Where to Buy
Does any one know the symbol of Marriage?!!
Andrew Cyrille & Maono With David Ware, Ted Daniel, Lisle Atkinson - Junction
So, here is a list of specific items that I would like them to contain. If you wish to make a certain item - let me know and I will make sure that we won't end up with to many of one item and to few of another. If you think of something else that could be useful that is NOT on this list - let me know!
So, if like me, you have been putting querying off. If you have been holding on to that manuscript for fear, but deep down you are proud of it, know that it is polished, and know that it is the best you can offer. Then Go BIG! Good luck querying and may God grant you a request for a partial or a full!
はじめより持たざるひとつを喪（うしな）ひしもののごとくに胸に秘め置く
Cabbage Patch & American Girl Doll clothes that she had a
I so enjoyed telling the patron about mom and why this piece, in particular, was so important. It was the first time mom had tried painting a large watercolor. She was so proud of it that she kept it in her bedroom as a reminder that she was, indeed, a professional artist.
GLORY BE
This verse has another implication: “Kṛṣṇa’s wives, although knowing that their husband is the supreme controller (bhartuḥ īśvaram matayaḥ yathā), still treat him as if he is a weak, simple, submissive man (abalāḥ mūḍhāḥ strainam ca) as they lead him around in private affairs (anuvratam rahaḥ).”
It all started when I had to get my mandatory “you’re moving to America and we have to make sure you’re not a carrier for Super-Ebola or some other scary virus that we saw in a movie one time, therefore it is real” medical examination or the YMAWHMSYNCSESOSVTWSMOTTRME, for short.
ROMNEY: I’d like — I doubt that’s my ad, but we’ll take a look and find out. There are a bunch of ads out there that are being organized by other people.
Where: Home
And also to get some photos of ME, to prove I was actually on the trip as well.
Effective Teamwork in the Workplace
During her life Bernadette suffered much. She was hounded by the public as well as by civic officials until at last she was protected in a convent of nuns. Five years later she petitioned to enter the Sisters of Notre Dame. After a period of illness she was able to make the journey from Lourdes and enter the novitiate. But within four months of her arrival she was given the last rites of the Church and allowed to profess her vows. She recovered enough to become infirmarian and then sacristan, but chronic health problems persisted. She died on April 16, 1879, at the age of 35.
I was actually going to ask you what you were listening to lately. What are your favorite recent releases?
As promised- here is some information about my class store! But first some background: I decided to use a reward system for my behavior plan the first year I taught kindergarten. Basically the kids earned pennies for doing good things like neat work, helping clean-up, working quietly, bringing in homework, etc. They also lost pennies for breaking class rules. I always explained it to them that just like moms and dads have jobs- kids have jobs too. As kindergartners their job was to be a good listener, be a kind friend, and do great work. Moms and Dads get paid when they do their job, and in our classroom kindergartners get paid for doing their job. Every other Friday we open p our class store for students to use their hard-earned pennies. They love this! And I love the class store because it gives my students great practice with counting, identifying coins, making fair trades for nickels and dimes, making change, making good consumer choices, and spending/saving.
The sketches below are from a pocket sketchbook...it suffered from a mishap involving water and cough drops, but I thought I'd still post these...so please pardon the red splotches and water stains :P...
I reward myself with chocolate after the kids are asleep for surviving the day.
Typical garb for males is a tunic or large shirt that hangs to the knees, belted at the waist, with a pair of wool trousers below. Footwear consist of moccasins or "socks" of fabric wound around the feet. Women wear dresses, falling to the ankles, instead of a tunic and do not wear trousers, though adventuring females are likely to opt for male clothing as a matter of practicality. Women have significantly fewer rights than men do in Teutonic society.
Disney Classics - Peter Pan is 8".
It is seen by many in the field as a turning point. “It laid out what should be done, and set out quality markers, not just for acute medical care but for longer-term care too,” says Eileen Gambrell, Services Manager at Different Strokes, a national charity for stroke patients of working age. “That allowed people to go back and see what progress had been made. It set out a lot of challenges and kick-started a lot of improvement. There is still a long way to go, but it was certainly a good starting point.”
to buy goat milk because I am attempting to make cheese. We also bought cow's milk and eggs. However, I have recently acquired a gnat problem and did not want almost cheese hanging from my sink. So, while I was attempting to eradicate the tiny pests (Trying to drown them in vinegar and dish soap did not work. They swarmed the mixture but none committed suicide. I have been spraying them with water and then wiping them up...one by one.) my kids drank all of the goat's milk. The cheese will be made after our next trip to the farm.
Cream butter and sugar.
Nor grass grow long above our heads and feet,
01-Announcement
I have some questions for Ron Clark: Should everyone have trusted the teachers who recently cheated on standardized tests? Should parents trust the teachers who sexually assault children? The ones who harass and demean and emotionally abuse children?
(Almost) all projects for me ceased because I was in charge of planning a major event for the church I attend. Pierce Chapel UMC just held a Global Impact Celebration last week, and it was a huge success, and a TON of work, which is my only excuse for no crafty/design/diy posts at all! :)
Always Right
Being left at the alter twice now has Gwen Maudsley rethinking what she is doing with her life. She is always the nice girl and now is going to be wicked. She wants to enjoy a certain passion as she will journey to Paris to find her brothers ring. She will not be alone in this adventure as a friendly face joins her who is like her brother but her feelings towards him are anything like a sibling.
SAPS internal auditor Colonel Phumlani Matshona told the Johannesburg high court that he was approached by the police to compile a report about the accused.
Did any of you hear the news that Israel has banned the use of underweight models in ads? My initial reaction, when I read about this a few weeks ago, was approval. Models in Israel now have to provide proof that they are not malnourished by the World Health Organization's standards, which states that a person with a body mass index of below 18.5 is malnourished. I think it's wonderful that Israel cares enough about its citizens that it would try to do something to prevent the development of eating disorders in its girls and women. Plus, I think we’re all aware of how prevalent “thin worship” is in the media.
I’ve also been busy planting at home. My lovely Mam gave me some sunflower seeds. She gave me four different varieties, including one called “Teddy Bear” which looks particularly nice. I planted these in 5 inch pots and they are sitting on a sunny windowsill while they germinate. I also planted some sage, which, surprisingly, germinated within a few days. My other herbs are doing well in my little greenhouse and should be ready to plant out in another three/four weeks. My marigold are growing strong and my tomato and chilli plants are coming along nicely too.
“Here?” My mother seems confused and draws her attention from the ruined shoe. My father has come to join us and is carrying my riding boots.
&nbsp&nbspBus: Currie to Balerno (Lothian Buses 44)
Although not invited to any Hallowe'en dos per se. I am off to a rather exciting launch party on the 30th at the magnificent Fetcham Park hmm perhaps I could have a little fun?!
It is, for obvious reasons, a very emotive subject which produces strong and passionate arguments both for and against.
Artist and writer Letizia Mancino's style is very creative and witty. Her imagination is outstanding.
-That can’t be bad.
But then I criticize both Whitehead and Latour for reducing these individual entities to their relations. And I continue to maintain this point despite an increasing number of claims that Whitehead and Latour do no such thing. I’m willing to keep fighting this battle, but I really don’t see how the point can be avoided. Both of them not only reduce entities to their relations, but do so quite proudly and explicitly. Indeed, both of them consider this to be among their own major innovations.
Because Bethancourt is the sole member of Alaska in Winter and does not read or write music, he uses multi-track recording to build his musical layers, using a variety of techniques.
If you miss some American style bakery and cafe in Ho Chi Minh City, here’s one for you to enjoy. We learned about this place from Lonely Planet. You can find cinnamon rolls and bagels there. It’s a cute little place on Bui Vien Street, a very happening street with many restaurants, bars and some shops where it seems to be another tourists hang-out besides Dong Khoi Street. Bui Vien is very close from where we stayed, Asian Ruby 3 Hotel. The night we went to Sozo, we walked from Dong Khoi Street near Sheraton to Bui Vien. It’s a walkable distance although it’s a long walk.
Right now, you might be asking yourself… What does this have to do with balancing the budget? Well, actually a lot.
Of course, it's the far left version I'm obsessed with, View B, the black sort-of-sack dress that is the quintessence of Hefty-bag hauteur. Of course, the first thing it made me think of was this -- quick: name that I Love Lucy episode!
Why did it take a scripture I’ve read and read and read…
So it is with these principles in mind that we begin our journey. It won’t be easy. Never is. But with the focus and clarity to be found in our common passion – nudism – we can cut through the unnecessary layers and ultimately achieve… success undressed.
And the looks
The inspiration? Well, it was very, very much the way my friends and I felt when we were teenagers: we took "summer freedom" very seriously. As we got older, we worked, of course, but the way we saw it, we'd worked hard all year long, and we'd work hard for the rest of our lives, so there was nothing wrong with taking some time off in the summer and enjoying ourselves. We were only going to be young once! Work hard and play hard.
The weekend is in sight, this week the weather has been so lovely reminds me of last year when Alex was only 4 months old and we sat out in the garden, no chance of that now he wants to toddle everywhere!
Today has been a really nice day.
i want the world opened to her. at a young age i know that she is smart, talented. and in reality, she needs a complete family. i don’t know where to start.
I also love the diversity of art that I see with this swap.
I made several cards, and the following were embossed in black directly on the card front and painted with water color paints. Then I masked and stamped the backgrounds and the sentiment. Easy peasy!
Those are my two nit-picky issues. My two biggest issues tie in together and are what bring the structure of the novel crumbling down. First, way, way, way too many plot lines. There was Eric and his maker and Alexi, Bill’s recovery, Sam and the protesters, all the Victor stuff, Sookie and Hunter, Claude staying with Sookie, they mysterious fairy in Sookie’s yard, and the werewolf killing and I probably missed a few! All were very interesting and would have been awesome…if only one or two were chosen. There was no time to fully develop any of these plots. So many loose strings were left dangling at the end of this book that it left me frustrated.
Latino immigrants, he said, tend to form tight-knit job networks. “What employers learn to do, if they find workers they’re content with, they ask those workers to bring any relatives or friends and become more dependent on them.”
Sexuality Policy Watch (SPW) is a global forum composed of researchers and activists from across the globe. Co-chaired by sociologists Sonia Correa and Richard Parker, SPW has offices in Rio de Janeiro and New York.
The primary meaning of the word “riddle” is “a mystifying, misleading, or puzzling question posed as a problem to be solved or guessed.” The secondary meaning is “something or someone difficult to understand,” with a synonym being “mystery.”[1]
- comes with washable fabric, adjustable rainbow hood, stylish n light weight frame, basket, footrest, headrest, front bar, safety belt, wheels with brakes and easily to fold
“Colombian?” said brown hair. “We’re Italian.”
I’m against silencing people, no matter how annoying I find them, how much I disagree with them, or how much I have to shake my head in disbelieve caused by their lack of knowledge of simple facts (or refusing to acknowledge them). They are not being shown their errors by trying to silence them, rather that would enforce them in their believe that they are right. They are being shown their errors by pointing out their errors. This is the way a Democracy deals with differing opinions.
"Best place in town to take a leak."
3. Copy editors can allow reporters to break the rules of journalism in blogs.
2. .277/.330/.459 with 166 doubles, 35 triples, 166 homers.
Did you know?
And a dejected air.
Throw in an onion, and some tater’s to boot.
P.S. - I sent some packages home. Please dont open them.
Good morning my Scraptastic friends!
2. Did churchgoers have a different psychological profile than non-churchgoers? In other words, were non-churchgoers disproportionately made up of individuals who had trouble complying with a rules-based culture?
Winners are people who are charged up with creativity, excitement, and optimism. Chances are many of them are trying to achieve something worthwhile – maybe the same thing you want to gain. Let their enthusiasm expand and rub off on you. Add people like that to your list of friends.
Just then, Haley's Comet flew over in the skies and lightning struck in the distance. Polar bears roared in the distance, the bodies of many holy men were resurrected as brain-hungry zombies, and gymnasts did back handsprings. Finally, before I left the hospital, I received my birth certificate, which read:
- Passion fruit pudding in petite glasses
I watch these shows where the people have sought out help with making the necessary and drastic changes in their lives, yet are apathetic and resistant to those very changes and the people who have stepped up to provide the knowledge, assistance, and guidance to make the changes. I recognize myself in this. I have so many reasons for wanting to make the changes. Many of those are the same as those I’ve been watching. What I don’t recognize in myself is that spark, trigger, or epiphany moment that ignites the change and the drive and determination to sustain the efforts to do what needs to be done moment by moment and day by day in order to affect the change.
Of course there were slot machines at the bar and we still had money in our pockets so we gambled a bit. Hubby asked for my last five dollars and after I gave in I continued sipping my drink. Just seconds later I heard, “We’re done here.” My first thought was you already lost it all. Then I looked over and saw numbers flying upwards. “OMG, how much did you win?” “$100 which just paid for all our evening’s entertainment.” We cashed out and ran for the door. Like I said, we’re not gamblers.
I found this book extremely well-written, enjoyable and thought-provoking and now that I have broken my long abstinence, I will certainly read my way through his other novels.
any
Accept that you’re going to make mistakes. You’re going to learn what works and what doesn’t, and so you need to figure out how you are going to incorporate continuous improve­ment into your social media strategy and practice. One important element of improvement is to be open to innovation from your staff. Chances are good many have significant experience in social media and can help suggest improve­ments.
It's best to use cream that is beginning to sour and turn into sour cream for butter. When you hesitate to put raw milk cream into your coffee, then it's time to make butter. It will be thicker and faster to turn into butter. Homemade cultured butter is even better with different nutritional benefits and a richer taste since it's almost like a cheese-and-butter fusion, as well as cultured buttermilk with its richer nutrients, but that's another post.
and prefer them over any toy or rattle.
MOST BEAUTIFUL: This is a tough one to start with. I'm not sure that anything I write is "beautiful". Still, if anything comes close to it, I suspect it must be this: Moments in a Life Well-Lived - the eulogy I delivered at my Grandfather's funeral.
All told, I fished 102 cards out of the quarter boxes. I didn't even go through all the boxes. I forced myself to cut myself off so I could get to some other tables.
1 midst
